Time: 20 February 2012, 18:00-20:00
The U.S. response had both humanitarian and realpolitik aspects. We wanted the flow of cheap oil to be unimpeded. But, when Saddam threatened to extend his control over not just Kuwait, but possibly Saudi Arabia, we acted in our own interests to make sure the oil flowed freely. In the bargain we gave Kuwait back to the Kuwaitis when we were done.
*A campaign is an interconnected series of D&D adventures, usually involving a group of similar players (and characters) over time.
Last weekend at the scene of a shooting outside the Apollo Theater (the victim not likely), a night watch detective explained to me that the likely/not-likely term grew out of a bureaucratic need to set the homicide investigation wheels in motion as early as possible.
While his theory might be new, the larger reality he describes isn't. Policing has always varied place to place. In the U.S., police work has always meant something different in poor neighborhoods populated by people of color that it has in wealthier, whiter environs.
In between the turkey, gifts, and mummers visits, we had some time to enjoy the wonderful winter weather, and then I hid away to write about it. You can visit Writing Home to read about our day on the pond.
Below, you'll find a list of the cold weather clothing that will make winter riding less of a bone chilling experience.
If you’d like to participate, go to the BCM website and enter via:
Before he lost his U.S. Senate primary race, candidate Muse gave a list of issues he felt were overlooked, including infant mortality, the criminal incarceration rate, housing and urban health care.
That would never leave a dry eye in the room
As threatened, doing patch work on my synopsis in a way that doesn’t lend itself to posting the results in a blog. I’m taking a couple of days to fold in the “dead not dreaming” idea, changing what needs to change in the story as a result. I think it’s going to work. Not entirely sure yet, but I like the idea enough that I’m willing to jigger things around to see if I can make it fit.
But, I am struggling. The only wall I’ve ever had with him was to keep away from the physical, because we weren’t ever available at the same time. But, in all other aspects I’ve always been completely and utterly open and honest with him and vice versa. He knows about every guy I’ve gone out with and slept with. I’ve always weighed in on his relationships and told him exactly what I think. He knows my hopes and dreams and I know his. Now that we crossed the line physically there is nothing holding anything back. And it TERRIFIES me.
So take things slowly, and let him know that if he needs to take a break because his mind is wandering, it's okay for him to tell you that. You'd rather he be honest so that he can get his heart and head right and start again.
12 Do you eat in secret?
I've been trying to wait to blog until I'm a little bit less... discouraged. But it hasn't happened yet so, here I am.
12 Hamster Theatre - Jeanne-Marie
Crimp third side of packets to seal.
Many imitations could possibly be wonderful groups that is consistently quite a distance exceed via glances where one can pricier the cheapest mass-produced bags and also m51154 ..
And of course I listen to music. Who doesn’t? Do you really listen to Frank Sinatra?
And before anybody says it I am fully aware that Sting is a highly successful musician who is so rich that he didn't even notice when his accountant syphoned five million quid out of Sting's account and I have just done four night shifts in a row and feel like I ahve been punched in the brain.
Wesley Wright made it with the Astros. Bryan Morris is in Triple A with the Pirates. Pedro Baez is in Double A with the Dodgers. Jaime Pedroza was released last year. Brian Mathews has been out of pro ball since 2009.
Whereas John Owen, being a poore ould man borne and breed in the parish of Llanfydd being grievously troubled with a disease…that he is not able to travel and seeke or get his bodily foode & sustenance by reason it is broken out in several places of his body, the quantity of seven or eight places…so beseeching all good and charitable people out of charitie to commiserate his distressed state to bestow their benevolence towards payment to the churgeon…”
And if physical stuff wasnt enough, its gonna RAIN!
25 “Yet you say, ‘The way of the Lord is not fair.’ Hear now, O house of Israel, is it not My way which is fair, and your ways which are not fair? 26 When a righteous man turns away from his righteousness, commits iniquity, and dies in it, it is because of the iniquity which he has done that he dies. 27 Again, when a wicked man turns away from the wickedness which he committed, and does what is lawful and right, he preserves himself alive. 28 Because he considers and turns away from all the transgressions which he committed, he shall surely live; he shall not die. 29 Yet the house of Israel says, ‘The way of the Lord is not fair.’ O house of Israel, is it not My ways which are fair, and your ways which are not fair?
I have taken to buying old, long, flowery 1980's skirts and cutting them off at a more appropriate 2010 length. They look great with the boots.
from Brussels' famous Grand Place. It is in a much larger space than
Wasilla Watch: Sarah Palin and the Rape Kits
Well, that was it for the bird cage but i also would like to show you the inside of the card i made last week because it totally disappeared from my post and i absolutely do not know what i did, lol!
Why haven’t our friends in DC & the cool prez said anything about this? campaigning campaigning campaigning campaigning campaigning campaigning
Soon after the birth the man formed a relationship with another woman who became his wife and they had children. 'The fraud that took place over the years deprived him and his family of a huge amount of money which otherwise they would have been able to enjoy,' counsel remarked.
The recent spate of accidents also lead to rising concerns over the driving skills of foreign bus drivers under the employment of both bus companies.
many blessings to you this lords day.....love terry
I know that it is finished
Schools that did not do so well were Kidbrooke School (now Corelli College) – 35% (40%) and Crown Woods – 32% (45%). With these two, action is being taken with academy status for Kidbrooke and distinct streaming for Crown Woods. With the proposed closure of Blackheath Bluecoats things do seem to be happening in the world of Greenwich state education. The full set of results can be found here http://www.education.gov.uk/cgi-bin/schools/performance/group.pl?qtype=LA&superview=sec&view=aat&set=1&tab=51&no=203&sort=ks4_11.ptac5em&ord=desc
The pen arrived Saturday, and I've been happily playing with it while waiting for the snow to melt. I love the signature on the end of the barrel, which is in lower case in keeping with the corporate name.
1 relishes
The 50s saw the red scare, fanned by McCarthyite rhetoric, blaze into life in Hollywood. With the HUAC inspired blacklists casting a dark pall over the movie capital, there was a kind of desperation in the air, a need to prove one’s patriotism and simultaneous rejection of the evils of communism. This meant the decade saw the production of a number of films directly addressing the issue and sending out a message to the witch-hunters that the industry was aware and prepared to play ball. Whatever contemporary reactions may have been, these films, by and large, not only seem lousy when viewed today but they also remind us of all those careers and lives left in tatters by the taint of the blacklist. From a purely artistic standpoint, the ham-fisted presentation of political dogma and the judgemental tone adopted both bog down the narrative and, in the worst cases, leave a very sour taste. However, there are always exceptions, and William Wellman’s The Iron Curtain (1948) is one of the more polished and less hysterical pieces of work from a generally unsavoury interlude in cinema history. I think this is partly due to the skills of Wellman as a filmmaker, and partly as a result of the production taking place right at the beginning of HUAC’s reign of terror, before it’s raging paranoia had fully matured.
Videography
His new friend Luke, son of Hermes,; god of thieves and travelers, gave him a pair of rubber shoes that has wings, but since he should avoid air for Zeus might snap him to death like a fly, Percy gave the magic shoes to Grover, who delightfully accept it… Percy, leaves the camp with his new-found friend, Annabeth, daughter of Athena and Grover, the satyr.
Scroll : Dusty Attic
However, due to the second emotional/relationship crisis in as many months, I was feeling down enough to give it a try.
Then for lunch, I made another not great decision. I got apple dippers (without caramel), which was fine, but I also got a grilled chicken chipotle bbq snack wrap. It's not terribly high in calories, but the sauce is pretty sugary, and it has full fat cheese in it, so I should have just stuck with my side salad with grilled chicken. But my will power was low at the time and that sounded good to me, so that is what I got. The good thing I can say for the day though is that generally when I do stuff like this, even if it isn't something to completely derail me, I derail myself by saying, "Well, now the day is ruined so I might as well just have that ice cream cone that's looking really good and a mocha frappe." I wanted those things, but I didn't have them, because I told myself that the day wasn't ruined, that even though I ate some off-plan food and some candy (for shame...) that I could still eat healthy the rest of the day. That's a pretty big deal for me. I tend to have a perfectionist and all-or-nothing personality so to be able to make a logical decision like that about reigning it back felt very good. So once I got home, I made the decision to eat one of the snacks that I'd planned and then if I felt hungry later I would eat more, but if not, that would be all I had for the day.
With our hearts thus raised we headed off again, further and further from civilisation, along twisty single track lanes, that are the main roads here, navigating simply by following the road, as there are few turn offs and junctions. Until we came to the junction that took us toward Badachro, and our destination, Dry Island. I will save a history and description of Dry Island till later, suffice to say it sits in Loch Gair, has two buildings, and seemed a perfectly peaceful retreat.
Let no one bewail transgressions, for forgiveness hath dawned forth from the tomb. Let no one be fearful of Death, for the death of the Saviour hath set us free. He hath quenched Death by being subdued by Death. He Who came down into Hades, despoiled Hades; and Hades was embittered when he tasted of Christ’s Flesh. Esaias, anticipating this, cried out and said: Hades was embittered when below he met Thee face to face. He was embittered, for he was set at nought. He was embittered, for he was mocked. He was embittered, for he was cast down. He was embittered, for he was fettered. He received a body, and encountered God. He received earth, and met Heaven face to face. He received what he saw, and fell whither he saw not.
Then I added some Smooch Glitz Frost to the vines, and some Clearsnap Ocean Spray glitter.
She does. And she doesn't seem to care that it's whimsical instead of perfect. In fact, I'm pretty sure that she thinks it is perfect.
Cllr Murray thanks Searchlight and says that the BNP is finished.
He wondered out loud “who could this have been?”
So this is the question I have always wanted to ask, Bill (as Faulkner was affectionately referred to around Oxford). Did you finally conclude that Shakespeare was wrong? Did you discover that our shadowed lives are more than tales told by idiots, more than mere sound and fury, and that our lives do, in fact, signify something, especially when the compassionate soul finds a way to speak, to lift the human heart, and to imbue man with courage, honor, and hope? As you can see, Bill, there was so much we could have discussed on that humid summer evening some fifty years ago. Ah, but why debate the past? As you have always reminded me, Bill, the past is never really dead — indeed, it's not even really past.
I blame those (wonderful) podcasters for 'enabling' me - Diane in particular! She is just the sweetest knitter I've ever not met - LOL :-) She (and other podcasters) have mentioned a few times about the bags they have been buying for their projects. Truth be told, I've never put my projects in a bag, but I had to change that after seeing their bags. And here's mine . . .
Then, are you planning to move on to bigger venues or do you prefer the more intimate format even though many fans are left out? Do you want to move out of the Hongdae scene or do you prefer to keep things the way you are?
for various reasons. At issue is Obama's assertion that the Senate is not in session and he therefore has the authority to make temporary recess appointments. However, as defined by the Constitution, the Senate is indeed in session which means that Obama cannot make a recess appointment. Although the President is frustrated by this constitutional provision, he (nor any other President) has the authority to decide when the Senate is in session.
I am not sure if self publishing will ever rival publishers like Scholastic, Hyperion (Disney), Harper Collins or Simon and Schuster. But time will tell. More and more authors are turning to self publishing…one self published author reportedly sold one million books this year. Another sells around a total of one thousand books a month with all of his book sales combined.
1. The Henry's beer list has gotten better. They boasted 100 taps when they opened, but about half were indistinct national brands or safe bets. They've gradually expanded their list of interesting beers and now have at least a dozen that are hard to find elsewhere. It's also a great place to take people who like beer but aren't super familiar with the arcana of styles. The menu is arranged roughly by beer style, so it's easy to do a tour. Examples of interesting beers right now: HotD Blue Dot, Walking Man Cherry Stout, a nice Belgian selection (Saison Dupont, Delirium Tremens, Hoegaarden), and Ninkasi.
- Room temperature ingredients: I let everything sit out on the counter overnight to make sure there was no chill at all on them.
2 Samuel 16 includes the interesting event of the cursing of David by Shimei. David’s men want to kill Shimei, but David will not allow it, stating that if God has told this man to curse him and throw stones at him, who is he to object. So David and his men continued down the road, while Shimei followed along, throwing rocks and spewing curses at David. Verse 14 says that David and his men “arrived weary at the Jordan.” I imagine so.
In March of 2010, Mr. Jonathan had sent Douglas to meet
After the cat shrine we travelled down the coast to Hiwasa, a town that is famous for the sea turtles that lay their eggs on the beach (which is designated a national park). It is also home to Yakouji Temple, the 23rd temple on the Shikoku 88 temple pilgramage. It was beautiful. The view from above reminded me somewhat of Shimoda on the Izu Peninnsula where I spent my AFS year. Shimoda is prettier though…
The association agreement also contains a chapter on intellectual property rights (IPR). The parties are asked to respect certain standards of IPR protection as well as to guarantee an adequate IPR enforcement by making civil, criminal and administrative remedies and measures available to right owners. Most of these provisions complement and integrate the TRIPS Agreement.
They are so easy to cook. Sauté until goldy-brown on both sides, that ought to do ya. Don't be afraid of a little heat! We splattered ours with lemon juice, melted butter and capers, though I'm sure a more genteel sauce would be nice.
6. World religions
They just assume I know.
And, in case your curious, it's another boy. :-)
I'm not an annual flower kind of the girl, my garden is mostly shrubbery and perennials, but I do have a few urns and cast iron plant holders that I fill up with annuals for shots of colour in the garden. This if the first time I have ever purchased a Hibiscus, usually I stick with Asters, Geraniums, Bacopa and Sweet Potato Vine, German Ivy and Vinca Vines for fillers.
ANIMAL REACTIONS: You will find that dogs and cats and other animals will become aware of your energy and be frightened of it or want to be around it all the time. Many animals can’t get enough of the energy. Others are somewhat frightened because they do not understand it.
Bacon & Ground Beef what could be finer?
The biggest point is that Camra have not held back brewing innovation but have single handedly saved British brewing with their continued support of both iconic British brewers and small independent breweries alike, their continued campaigning to save local pubs, keep beer duty down and to keep real ale in any discernible drinkers thoughts.
Reflecting light upon the table as
I don’t usually feel excited at the prospect of visiting a different city, yet I really was looking forward to going back to my roots. Even booking myself into a hotel was exciting as the hotel I picked overlooks Roker Bay and Roker Pier. Places that I remember my mother telling me about, and I know they were favourite places where she used to walk - as did her mother and grandmother and great grandmother probably. Walking along the pier and the cliff paths, naturally I didn’t spot anyone dressed like the people in this old photo of the area, but it was easy to imagine them still hanging around…
Every once in a while it pays to check in with the ‘grey beards’ – this is the name I give to experienced and successful professional investors. Among this select group is Steve Leuthold of the Leuthold Group. He shared his insight in an interview with Bloomberg TV yesterday.
Lightships - Two Lines
A semi trailer containing 1,600 copies of “The Cornbread Mafia” by Kentucky author James Higdon was stolen from a storage lot in Elgin, Ill., on the night of April 28, according to police in the town, located about 40 miles west of Chicago.
Publish Date: April 3, 2012
She's not supposed to raise consciousness or educate - if they had wanted to do that, they'd naturally have brought on a guy instead.
Since I had already passed on the first 3 awards, I would like to pass on these 2 awards:
LC: In the end, what I love about all the Greek gods is, paradoxically, their humanity. The Olympian stage they act on is bigger and more magical than our own, but their emotional reactions to events are entirely recognisable to me. They are ourselves, writ large on the heavens.
You would never guess they were being tortured, Would you?
- Look for specific information on staff, so you can check bona fides (and skill--a good PR service should be staffed by experienced people). If you can't find this information on the service's website, move on.
white chocolate squares
It’s normal that it is. I mean, in real life we don’t usually roll on the floor laughing so hard that our asses literally fall off. But online it’s ok to say that this is actually is happening.
Grind almost 1 cup of buckwheat groats in a magic bullet or high powered blender to make fresh ground buckwheat flour. Mix one cup of flour with the rest of the above ingredients. Use a rubber spatula to mix well and it will start out crumbly like a pie crust and will turn into a cookie dough. Take Tb sized balls and roll them in the palm of your hand and then press down the little quarter-sized balls on a parchment papered baking sheet. This recipe will make between 2 1/2 to 3 dozen cookies depending on how large you roll your cookies. Bake cookies in a preheated 350 degree oven for 10 minutes and then let cool for at last one hour. Then make the following mint cream topping...
I've got less than 10 hours to get my work done and yet I'm not panicking. It feels so refreshingly scary cos this is so not me.
It wasn’t until almost the middle of the 19th century that life insurance was able to get past this objection, as cultural changes made gambling more acceptable to Americans (and the connection to life insurance less toxic) and life insurers began to appeal to the “moral duty” of husbands to provide for their families in the event of premature death.
Lucky I had that second test
Something dawned on me the other day. I haven't been blogging lately. I'm a month behind on my "read through the Bible in a year" plan. I don't remember the last time I worked out. These were all supposed to be priorities for me - what happened?
To feel unconditonal love is to feel free.
lime juice 1/2 tsp (optional)
There is a tone that hearkens pure,
On my lastest visit, I saw the new paved path they put through those woods, the widened and detangled paths, the more and more mowed bits, the headstones being remounted and new bodies being buried everywhere.
Before I answer this question, let me start by saying that I have been a dieter my whole life. Growing up chubby, my adult life has been plagued by self esteem issues. Even though I have never been obese, I just don’t like what I see in the mirror. Until recently, exercising has been one part of the diet program, and as a result they have been limited the occasional bursts of gym visits. Having achieved my goal weight and regained my fitness, Mish and 12wbt made me realize that to make that change PERMANENT, I would have turn healthy eating and exercising into a LIFESTYLE.
When people watch more than an half hour or so of television at a stretch, they go beyond the meditative state and fall into what is popularly called a stupor. The longer they watch, the deeper the stupor. When the set is finally shut off, they are hung over. It's a real hang over, not a figurative one, not a metaphorical one, but one every bit as real as the kind one gets from drinking too much alcohol. We've all experienced how surly and out-of-sorts children are after a marathon of TV -- that's the hang over.
LET THAT SINK IN FOR A MINUTE.
We may be a nation of homeowners, but we’ve lost our taste for ownership of our own economy and public services — from once-great manufacturers such as ICI to most of the companies that deliver our electricity, water and gas.
BSL uses physical appearance to predict behavior. Whether a dog is correctly identified as a pit bull or not, no behaviors should be automatically assumed based on this identification. All dogs are individuals, and should be treated as so.
Beer #154 Finest Kind IPA / Smuttynose Brewing Company, Portsmouth, NH
"I told you I'd be back to fuck that sweet ass." Jacob's words were muffled as he continued his assault on her breasts. Jason's kiss turned passionate and helpless to resist; she retaliated by wrapping her tongue round his. He groaned, and his cock nudged her naked thigh. He broke the kiss, sliding his full lips across her jaw to her ears.
Pink flower cut on Cricut, using flower shop cart
Ridley Scott going back to the Alien universe, but instead of doing a prequel to his first movie, he’s trying to expand the universe the characters exist in. This is going to be really interesting, and with its ties to the Alien world I can see this becoming a back to back watch. The trailer that just came out really hit the right notes for me and looks like it could deal with some big ideas which is always great for science fiction.
Month: 74.3 miles
Event: No Women, No Cry – A Maternal Healthcare Event
I think Sweets had the thrill of his young life yesterday at the supermarket. Our store has a limited number of these race car shopping carts, and every time I take him with me, I look eagerly for one, but they're always in use. Yesterday, we finally hit the shopping cart jackpot:
Not as of yet, but whenever we hit that first creative block, that may be a good device to move things along... thanks for the tip!
Honey’s message is sweet in its simplicity. She stumbles the first few times she tries to help others, but helping has become her passion and she keeps trying until she gets it right. Not bad advice for birds, kids, and even we adults who read this book to the little ones in our lives.
Khan was pretty good here, especially in his animalistic, short-memory persona. He was also entertaining in the flashback scenes, but more in his charming way there. There were a few times when he would snarl loudly that had me rolling my mind's eye, but all in all it was a dynamic performance. He was fucking ripped, and played quite the badass. His leaping across a room to throttle a man in his home, legs around the man's torso, beating his face was pretty sweet, I have to say. Flashback Sanjay though needed to lose his goddamn short sleeve dress shirts! Come on Aamir, I know you want to show off those guns, but really...
One of my personal favourites this year, a pair of lovers flee their New England town, which causes a local search party to fan out and find them. Directed by Wes Anderson and starring Bruce Willis, Bill Murray and Edward Norton. Out May 25th
First, you need to change the name of your country. Well, not really change, so much as alter. I mean, you don't want to lose brand identification, but these are much hipper times than when you were first founded. I was thinking of something catchy, like "iRan." You want to jump in and corner the market on this right away, before Iraq scoops you on this one. Strike while the reactor's hot, and all that.
Maybe it is too harsh to say Savage does not like the people who took a stand and walked out when he was criticizing the Bible at a High School journalism conference. I am not sure why it is ok to speak about the Bible, if you like it or not, since this is a school function and as many Christians know there is supposed to be a separation of church and state. I would think if you could not preach your message from it, then you should not be able to speak ill of it either, outside of criticizing the poetry or literary properties of it.
Beading and little painted cut outs were applied to the finished stitching. As a matter of fact, this was one of my fiirst free motion abtract art stitcheriea, completed in the spring of 2004.
chips;
I have noticed it has started to get the crack effect at the sides of the nails. Which I do hate with nail polish :(
There was one other quote that could have led to something substantive:
Baby Love stamp set!! by CTMH
Fasting is basically not eating for a certain period of time to bring ourselves in line with God.
I was homeless (at least thats what was checked on the census) living at a roach motel. My home life before was bad my dad and step-mom were using serious drugs daily. No one ever slept and my dad had to let me boyfriend move in (mostly for protection). I think that I wanted to be "good" and I would have loved school but when there is partying all night long it is hard to sleep, which makes it hard to go to school.
For each poision, there is sure to be a antidote.
Prepare biscuit mix (doubled mixture)
Gird your loins and hide your wallets! Today I have one of the most amazing polishes I've seen in a while, St George, from a-england's new collection, The Legends. I have a mixture of outdoor and lightbox photos for you because I was really doing everything I could to capture just how amazing this polish is. The lightbox photos pretty accurately represent what the polish looks like indoors for me.
Sérgio, VInicius, Cézar, Frederico, Paulo e Cláudio (twins), Robertinho e Maurício Maestro. Musicians and people of the highest caliber.
For my first scapular I chose a lovely feminine miraculous medal picture and a matching Sacred and Immaculate Heart that I had drawn many years ago.
For more info, see:
During last summer’s massive heat wave, Von Pinnon, editor of Fargo North Dakota’s The Forum wrote this: This summer’s excessive severe weather – some of it deadly – has really awakened us to a much bigger issue that has more to do with how we live today. After all, dangerous and deadly weather is as old as weather itself. But how we learn about it before it potentially harms us largely depends on how we communicate, and how we communicate is changing about as fast as the weather around here.
The Mediterranean diet has long been considered one of the healthiest diets on the planet – and indeed it is ! There are myriad of research that proves that eating a diet rich in plant foods and healthy fat is good for us. Research also show that a Mediterranean diet protects individuals against cardiovascular disease, type 2 diabetes, some types of cancer, Alzheimer’ s disease and also leads to a longer lifespan. The key to longer lifespan lie in the fact that this diet does not adopt modernized foods(that we in the US consume excessively) such as processed foods, deep-fried foods, tendency to eat more meat and fewer fruits and vegetables .
When the egg/eggs hatched, this young couple had to figure out how to feed the baby/babies. Mr. Bluebird fed himself first, downing four or five mealworms before taking one to the chick. Mrs. Bluebird, with true maternal instincts, fed the baby first and only herself after the chick was taken care of. Unlike last year's group, these did not always finish off the mealworms in record time. Whether it was because they had only one baby, while last year's had at least three or not; the result was that other birds became interested, particularly the brown thrasher. After he devoured the remaining mealworms at one meal, they seemed to become better organized and more purposeful in the feeding and took turns flying back and forth from the birdhouse to the mealworms. This couple added one stage, taking the mealworms to the roof for processing before flying them to the baby.
In 1951, he joined Hradec Králové but an incident at 1953 May Day parade would result in the Communist Party forcing him to leave the city.
thirst again?
This scene of scantily clad dancers and coatless clowns only needs a dusting of white to make it picture perfect and shiveringly distressing and I hurry away to the town centre in case the whispers hear me and get any nasty ideas.
I never know how to finish posts, so all I can say now is to anyone not saved reading this, please think about it, and those who are, maybe it's time to reach out to people more. I hope to try to do that myself.
Be sure to pop by MDUC to check out the prize for this week from our generous sponsor Stampyland and to also see the other DT's creations. If you have the time stop by and give them some commenting love, it always makes our days a lot better!
Thanks so much to Niemann Foods, and all of the great employees at County Market that scurried to deliver when I showed up this evening. This was so much fun, and will continue to be.
In preparation for half marathon training, I attempted my first round of speed intervals since...? Late January or early February? To see how it would feel, I put on 4x800m at 7:11 pace. Aside from messing up my distances on the treadmill because I apparently can't count, it felt TOUGH but do-able. With that, I'll use my upcoming 5k race time to set my training paces for next week's start to half marathon training.
Now what was I going to blog about today..........hmmmm...........seems like it was something important, but I just can't seem to remember--I'm just kidding. :)
So, I called the director of the school and sent her all my docs and she spent an entire day trying to call the OFII office. They never answered the phone until late in the day. They told her that when I got my papers from the prefecture downtown, a letter was supposed to be sent to me automatiquement that gave me the date and time for my medical exam. I had never received that letter. She told me that I had to call them and remind them to send me the letter.
SirLinderoth: calls $0.50
I know at iVillage.com I wrote about Molla Space because I told you the story of the fake proposal Dave made with a real, yet still fake, diamond. And I’ve featured some of their products as gift ideas on Brides.com. But I wanted to make sure that you, dear reader, knew about this fabulous site.
The EU and its member states were accused of throwing money away to an undeserving country when the Greek crisis was its peak – with Ireland even the Daily Mail seems to get its facts straight about the EFSF.
I give up..
It’s been a long time since writing my book, until recently. I was so close to finishing it. Only two days left in the book before the end….but somehow, I couldn’t end it…until now.
The Voice of New Zealand, Broadcasting to the Pacific, Te Reo Irirangi O Aotearoa, O Te Moana-Nui-A-Kiwa, reported that Kiribati’s minister for environment, Tetapo Nakara, says the government wants to ensure a viable use of its resources. “Certain areas of the Phoenix Islands will be declared a marine protected area. In March, we’ll going to have the negotiation with the potential donors and after that we’ll determine the timeframe. The main reason for this is part of the government’s commitment to conserve the place and the biological diversity.”
Brulee gave a non-commital grunt. Creme really hoped that she was accepting the apology.
Thus when divorce first entered the scene of marriage, it “promoted interdependency, with equal right to property, earnings, and child custody and guardianship… The idea was that they would consult with and listen to each other, and neither would force his or her will on the other”
Or are full blown wacko at your zoo.
My eating settled down too, my meals even when made of leftovers are square and healthy, I eat and cook a lot of fruits and vegetables, I enjoy nuts and I use very little extra fat in my cooking. My carbs are either coming fron veggies and fruits, either coming from whole grains. I drink a lot, herbal teas, teas, water and I take my multivitamin.
Why I picked ELTC/Edinburgh: I would like to learn British English and Edinburgh is a safe and terrific city in Scotland. I think Scottish people are very kind so Edinburgh is the best place to study English and live.
I look for the sea of yellow every Spring. I personally feel that these trees are perfect for this time of year, because the Arizona Spring is beyond transient. We’re lucky if we get a Spring at all (usually, it goes from super cold to 100 degrees outside), and I think it definitely is in the desert dweller’s nature to relish in what few mild months (weeks) we get in any given year. I know that soon these flowers will die off, and in a matter of weeks I will not even want to step foot outside due to the heat. For me, this time of year is bitter sweet- because the weather is great, but it’s only a matter of time before the heat sets in, and I’m forced back into my AC driven house. Great Nature is always shifting, and so I shift with it.
Now that you have the tools, getting started is up to you. Start slowly, have carrots or an apple for a snack, instead of a bag of chips. And take a walk around the block before or after work today. Just remember, the sooner you begin working toward your ideal weight, the sooner you can reap the healthful benefits.
a level of independence for herself...Her acts of charity, though maternal and feminine at heart in their seraphic care and devotion to the weak, allowed Consuelo to infiltrate the political sphere as one of the first women (the very first in the London County Council)...The fact that her role on the London County Council only comprises three pages out of the entire book, however, shows a reserve against excessive self-indulgence, which, in turn, depicts Consuelo as a woman who felt just as much need to write of society itself as her own story; most important to her was not her special roles, but how those roles allowed her to reform the wrongs she saw around her....
It was just two paragraphs in the Boston Globe that morning in October 2008:
The 6" layer was devil's food with a chocolate mousse filling. The 8" was strawberry.
Lastly? Pipe up if you have any suggestions or great ideas! Basically, this site is just a tidy place to organize us all and to get the word out that there are other bloggers like you... but we could definitely let this grow into something more if everyone is game.
But it's stuck with me.
- After World War II, with the creation of a giant steel mill, the city became an industrial center with a new working class and a jump in population growth.
5. We are now on Champ-VA medical insurance, so no more paying $600 for health insurance like we have been doing since Rodney lost his job in June. This is going to be a huge savings for us. I am not sure about the coverage yet but we will figure it out.
Attitude and sensitivity in just the way I like it.
Whence came it then that it was given to them from whom it was afterwards taken away? Remember that whatever is given is given of free gift. To whom then He let out the vineyard, He let it out not as to elect already and believing; but to whom He gave it, He gave it with a sentence of election.
What is
“You can call me Liam, Agent Green. No need to be so formal. We are going to be working with each other after all,” he watches her as they walk.
It is no exaggeration to say that the Met frontline are lions led by vacillating donkeys.
perfecting the city's form. I magnify the moment,
So here I have today, the recipe to making whole Tilapias the adapted way
There was just one catch, Tal continued. The owls are only worth something if… well, he knew it had something to do with their eyes. The village would hold a ceremony that night to check their eyes. We weren’t exactly sure what would be checked – we weren’t even sure if what was valuable was living owls, or if their eyes would be put out by the end of the night and handed over to a witch doctor – but nevertheless, we were invited.
Ceres Fair Food is a popular organic food delivery service which sources produce from local growers who are paid a fair price for their produce and also practice eco-friendly farming.
Please feel free to contact All Desert Gardening regarding your re-design questions or needs. We will be happy to assist with making your landscape an oasis.
And that's when something else hit me... what an era we live in where a high-concept sci-fi premise has mass market appeal.
So, sorry this post doesn't have a picture of Kendall smiling, holding hands, and singing songs with other kids her age. I don't have one. I'm giving up on the week at Vacation Bible School after the first day. I'm quitting. It sucked.
3. Don't be afraid to shamelessly tag along with friends who have wider writer's networks than you do. (This is fair warning to Tasha and to my sister). The friend of my friend is also my friend--right?
This thing with Jeff just had me fretting. More than bothered. But not angry. Not quite frustrated but I couldn’t let it go either. I was just fretting over it and it was making me kinda nuts. And that’s been going on for about two months now.
Indeed, he has said he would permit his child to die even if this enabled only two other children to live.
12. Atheism is a non-prophet organization.
Verses 6-15 contain some final instructions as the letter draws to a close. What example has Paul set for the Thessalonians that he expects them follow? What sin are they to avoid? What should be done with fellow believers who refuse to heed Paul’s warning? What is the purpose of such treatment?
Onto this week and it's theme time, we have chosen
What can I say? I love a good bargain. It was an $800 coat and it was on sale for $350. Perfect justification, right???
Blue skies hid between
2 oz. Willet rye whiskey
The photo’s were terribly grainy and dark ect…so ive just altered them a little…will have another try another time.
Line two standard 12-cup muffin pans with paper liners.
Oh, yes--I mentioned to Mrs. M that my birthday was Friday because she asked if I was Valerie's age. So today they gave me a bottle of Chanel perfume...
Clearly the only one in there with balls, I decided to use them before any more panic rose in my throat, so I pushed open the door, exited the stall, walked directly down the aisle and out the door as women parted in waves. That's when this happened...you know how sometimes you have a momentary out-of-body experience when you see yourself as others see you? Well I saw myself, my inside-wearing-sunglasses-self, my suddenly very-creepy-inside-wearing-sunglasses-self. I guess I didn't look as pervy as I imagined though because those women began laughing while I proceeded directly across the hall to the men's bathroom and began banging my head on the hand-dryer.
While we seek to weave God's Word into our every day conversations, we also plan for a daily Bible time with our children. Here are three tips that I've found helpful in making this a priority in our lives.
Take care my friends and have a blessed and awesome Sunday.
Regardless of whether its a good idea or not, it threw me for a loop and got me all lost in my head about what I want and what level of control I strive to have over situations and how frustrating it is to work so hard to make ends meet only to find out that in a few weeks, everything is going to change. Caleb dozed off in his narcolepsy-medication-coma and I tossed and turned for a little bit and then my first shift of sleep hit me and my brain was blessedly given some time to chill out.
This story has become even more convoluted. First you see a picture of the US Ambassador Gary Locke walking Chen Guangcheng into a hospital. Next news report is based on a Twitter account that states “My biggest wish is to leave the country with my family and rest for a while,” and that he remains concerned about the welfare of his family and himself. This was a brief snippet of events, and it is unclear what to make of the overall picture. However, at this point, CGC has the attention of the world media, and the Chinese government would like to quietly resolve this issue. The question is what will happen after Secretary of State Clinton leaves…will he and his family find safety elsewhere in China? Will he be allowed to attend law school? What happens once the international media tires of CGC?
But, along the way, as Buzz loses his camera and his temper, as he clings to his son on amusement-park bungee cords, confesses that the New York Times best-seller list sends him into a day-long sulk, and takes stock of his own life, and how he defines success, that is what happens.
How do people with less visible disabilities choose whether or not to disclose?
the storm and the vision of these luminous minds.
09 When Universes Collide
gedered þe grattest of gres þat þer were
They had the oracles of God; a religious history and heritage, yes, even God’s name for themselves. What they failed to understand was that their sin estranged them from God, and now, even to the point of setting them aside. For all those years, they put God to the test. Hear these words to Israel in Exodus 23:21.
I plan to add High Marshal Helbrecht next. I've also ordered some more Assault termies and I'm building some new neophytes (although I seem to be missing their heads. Guess it's time to give Genocide a call to see what WFB junk he's got laying around).
In this case that would mean the angles should equal 8-2*180°/8 or 135°.
Isn’t it fabulous ? These vintage aprons are popping up all over again & I love mine. Diane has a quaint little antique shop back in Wisconsin, you can visit her here.
Gyaru:
Jhona O.
The lesson might be, although claimed not to be, that theists are easily fooled, i.e. not all that bright. Atheists, the lesson might be, although claimed not to be, get it right because they are bright enough to analyze things.
And the winner of The First Love Cookie Club by Lori Wilde is Kitty from Kitty's Kozy Kitchen.
Out of curiosity — Have you ever written a super awesome goofy parody? Comment and tell us about it!
Until next time, live each day as if it were your last. Then you will realize what is really important. And start to be grateful for everything little or big thing that comes your way.
I am built to dig potatoes in the fields, not samba to Latin tunes.
The RMT say "Parity would bring Tube Lines staff free travel within London and 75 per cent of the cost of travel on the mainline railway – the concession that all Tube staff, including ex-Metronet people, already get."
To see what my fellow Design sisters have come up with, make sure you'll check out
“We have to pay for the spoons,” he patiently explained. “If you buy food – for example, soup – then we can give you a spoon for free.” We didn’t like to point out that it’s rather difficult to eat soup without a spoon.
Thank you Michael Koryta. We appreciate you taking the time to talk with Crime Watch.
It took me the longest time before I was even able to get back on my computer. It was way to difficult for me to even sit but I have to say that it feels so nice to be able to sit here this evening at my computer and type a new post. Honestly though I so need new Office Furniture! If you would only see the chair that I'm sitting in, or should I say, trying to sit in you would so understand.
Visas are categorized as immigrant or non immigrant. An immigrant visa is usually referred to as a resident visa. It is for people who want to take up permanent residence in another country. There are strict requirements for this type of visa. The process is usually long and expensive.
"Why?" Ubes asked.
Working Title: Everett
The key to this plan’s success, like any project this size, is to get certain groups of people excited about the project for completely different reasons, and at completely different times.
Our wonderful art teacher, Mrs. Taylor designed our fabulous cookie sheet!
OK, anyway I'm not really here to make small talk -it's SSSC time! And this week random.org has chosen...
Mel Fleming
I will see you tomorrow for the Saturday sketch share.
UP TO 61% OFF With built-in SPF rash guards and terry cover-ups your boys will enjoy playing on the beach or pool side for hours this summer.
This put everyone off, even those with the delicious ice.
“Just can’t wait to get on the road again.”
From the Homeric Hymn to Hermes:
I colored the butterflies with Copic Markers on both the card and the spare piece. I cut and glittered the butterflies on the cardstock, then cut them out and added them to the stamped image on my card. I finished the card with sponging using Memento Lulu Lavender and Summer Sky.
And now we’re champions. Not just sneaking into the play-offs, or buzzing around irritatingly below West Ham and Southampton in the automatic spots – although neither of those scenarios looked likely anyway, even as late as February. Bloody champions. With a game to spare.
At the back of my folder I have used the
“He definitely thought he was a little mad. But he didn’t see anything wrong with that. He figured everybody was to some degree.”
In order to best explain the formation of lymph, let’s backpedal for a moment…Blood supplies nutrients and important metabolites to the cells of a tissue and collects back the waste products they produce, which requires a change of respective constituents between the blood and tissue cells. However, this exchange is not direct but instead is effected through an intermediary called interstitial fluid or tissue fluid that the blood forms. Interstitial fluid (ISF) is the fluid that occupies the spaces between the cells and constitutes their immediate environment. As the blood and the surrounding cells continually add and remove substances from the ISF, it’s composition continually changes (the process of movement by which these fluids travel throughout the body will be discussed in depth in parts 2 & 3). ISF forms at the arterial (coming from the heart) end of the capillaries because of the higher pressure of blood compared to veins, and most of it returns to its venous ends and venues; the rest (1%) enters the lymph capillaries as lymph. Thus, lymph when formed is a watery clear liquid with the same composition as the ISF. However, as it flows through the lymph nodes it comes in contact with blood, and tends to accumulate more cells (particularly, lymphocytes) and proteins.
Thus grew the tale of Wonderland:
My best purchase though was a bottle of Treaty Oaks Rum made right here in Austin, TX. I've seen it before and at 15 bucks is was tough to pass up. It has some flavors atypical of most lighter rums. I can pick up on some nutmeg and you can definitely taste some sweeter juniper and anise as well as a melange of citrus flavors. As a gin guy this stuff appealed to me though it may not appeal to some. I typically hate rum that is not barrel aged but this bottle really surprised me.
*apart from Bill Murray/Owen Wilson/Steve Buscemi’s eyes(you’ll get it later)/George Clooney(on occasion)
12. Autumn Leaves 1965
Grand Prize: Airfare, hotel accommodations and passes to the Food Network South Beach Wine & Food Festival’s 10th Anniversary (Fest runs 2/24-2/27/11)
I only used one coat of Revlon Whimsical since I don’t like to many glitters but I will try with a double or triple coat next time.
Lips chanting an unknown anthem of the soul,
I can see this being a good one especially for special needs children. Some kids just do not like being touched, can't sit still long enough or have physical issues that may make using other thermometers more difficult. The RediScan worked great on all my kids. From my littlest one who likes to wiggle everywhere, to my oldest who's skin gets really clammy. I tried a few times to use my temporal scanner on my oldest when her skin was clammy, and it would come back as an error. I used the RediScan and within seconds I had her temperature.
Once I finish posting all five pages in the opening sequence, I'll announce the story title, set up an online archive of the pages and all that. Thank you for following along and being so supportive. :)
of Cohen, should exist
Do you think writing this book changed your life? How so?
Let’s take this in another direction. Back in the 1990s, a boy in Florida “divorced” his parents. What if Tammy’s new twins decide years from now to “divorce” Tammy and Melissa, and they want to find their anonymous sperm-donating father?
These are unsettling questions because they all reek of the foulest miasma a fan can know: the stench of the bandwagon. I can’t imagine a bigger insult to someone who considers himself a fanatic. Am I pretending to be hurt, or am I actually, really, honest-to-god hurt by Reggie Bush’s betrayal? I’m not sure. It could be a mixture. I can’t say I think about it every day outside of a cursory “Wonder how the appeals process will work out?” But I do remember trying not to cry when he accepted his Heisman, talking all the while about Lamar Griffin’s role in helping him succeed in life. Like any kind of pain that’s been with you long enough, I’ve become dependent on that pain. I wish it’s raison d’etre never existed, but it’s there and the fact that it does sometimes really hurt me means something in all of this is genuine, something is real, like holding your hand over a flame long enough to realize you’re alive.
It should be noted that whites may well agree with blacks on both sides of sensitive issues, further evidence that the line between racism and racialism is in the process of being defined.
If there were no consequences, no one and nothing else to consider, I would escape.
Is your child having a licensed character-themed shindig? Decorate a circular piñata with color-coordinating crepe paper, then glue on a circular character paper plate to both sides for a character piñata at a fraction of the price!
When a crash occurs, emergency medical first responders such as police officers, firefighters and emergency medical technicians are immediately dispatched to the scene. These responders usually have basic information such as the location of the crash and the number of victims. Frequently, minimal personal information is available during this early, most critical time period.
As a Guest Designer for Creative Craft Challenges2:
And eventually wills its way through thick fog
I’m gobsmacked! That’s a word I learned since moving to England and I don’t think there’s a better word to describe how I’m feeling right now. I feel very honored. And totally shocked. In a good way!
Made by Totally Bamboo, this cutting board has all the signs of lasting a very long time. The product description on Amazon as well as customer reviews indicate it’s made to very high standards and, if properly maintained, will be enjoyed for many years to come. I’m hopeful that, at under $80, the Totally Bamboo is a wise investment that is also kind to the tree world.
Ruined buildings (extra): They block LOS to everyone like obstacles do. Walkers and vehicles cannot enter this terrain. They provide hard cover to squads inside. If there are several levels of height, it takes one action to move up or down a level. Squads in higher levels can trace LOS over squads, tank traps, ammo crates, but not over walkers, other buildings or obstacles.
May 10 - Norma Zimmer, singer (champagne lady on "The Lawrence Welk Show"), 87
American women are generally immature, selfish, extremely arrogant and self-centered, mentally unstable, irresponsible, and highly unchaste. The behavior of most American women is utterly disgusting, to say the least.
So what then was the last item on my list? Jerusalem artichokes. I needed a pound of them, so I searched and searched the veggies section, but to no avail - where WERE the Jerusalem artichokes, and can't regular Monterey county artichokes suffice? I decided to approach Mr. Friendly Grocer Man:
My mom dressed me up for a Fancy Dress party at a Holiday Park we were staying at. My 9 year old sister and 4 year old niece had matching 'Cat' outfits. I was TWELVE. TWELVE whole years old.
time ever
Take my Aunt for example. No, really, take her. As far away as possible. Ha ha.
To be eligible for the credit, you must cover at least 50 percent of the cost of single (not family) health care coverage for each of your employees. You must also have fewer than 25 full-time equivalent employees (FTEs) and those employees must have average wages of less than $50,000 a year.
I don’t know if this is a hybrid, or partial albino, or why the rabbit is so white, but I have seen this same rabbit a few times over the years, and this is the best shot I have gotten of it.
THIS is what you get when someone like Sen. McCain and someone like Sen Kerry get together in the spirit of "bi-partisanship": the result is a leftist policy of funding what is clearly ending up to be a victory of the Muslim Brotherhood over the wished for democratic revolution.
Absolutely vile. Really. I sincerely doubted that this was how it was supposed to taste. I hurried back to the computer and checked the ingredients again - eggs (six) 250g of ground almonds and sugar. SUGAR. I had put the sugar on the work surface but failed to decant any into the mixture.
relationship have a stronger bond, where you don’t want out. Consequently, many
A Printz Honor winner for Your Own, sylvia, Stephanie Hemphill uses evocative verse to weave a nuanced portrait of one of the most chilling and fascinating times in our nation's history.
I could be anywhere!
The hardest part of the entire five minute ordeal was getting the screw into the hole of the new grip, as the screw hole lives at the bottom of a deep dark grip well hole. Carteach solved this by placing the screw and it's lock washer on the screwdriver, and then lowering the grip over it Vertically. Once that was done, the rifle was finished seconds later.
He went to work transferring things from here to there and everywhere. He perched his Little People policeman atop the Little People Manger where the angel is supposed to perch. Although maybe he saw them both in a "security guard" type of role.
Thing 3: I made my mom an apron from this fabric I bought at Whipstitch in Atlanta.
The project would have been California’s first new oil lease in 40 years. It proposed to drill new off Santa Barbara County from an existing platform. But the Governor says he has seen enough, and won’t allow new drilling.
As well as Roger’s and Bethany’s diaries and letters to each other - interspersed with the occasional letter from Bethany’s mother and other Staples employees, many chapters of The Gum Thief are chapters from Roger’s attempt at a novel: Glove Pond. Unfortunately, this novel is bad. Deliberately bad writing - at least deliberate on Coupland’s part - full of dry dialogue, telling-not-showing, faux-intellectual ponderings on life and creative but not quite successful imagery. And when so much of a book is full of bad writing and pretentiousness, even as a literary device, the lingering impression I take away from reading the book is - bad writing and pretentiousness. Glove Pond colours The Gum Thief - or perhaps I should say it sucks out all the colour, leaving a white and grey, cold and somewhat empty-feeling novel.
Businessman Jay Wagner (Robert Duvall) is framed for a murder in Mexico by his ultra-rich grandfather Harris Wagner (John Huston) and given a 28-year sentence to be served in a prison that allows conjugal visits by his wife Ann Wagner (Jill Ireland).
Imagine..She's so young..so talented!
Even with the colossal mess, it immediately felt right to have the couch in here. Even my husband remarked that it seemed cozier, so I think I'm going to try a little living room/dining room switcheroo and see how it goes.
Deputy National Security Advisor to The President of the United States (‘00-’01)
Pinch fresh coriander
I don't know what happened to my photos today, it's very dull and my pictures have come out a bit grainy. Maybe I'll try again later. Anyway, this is the Elegant Eggplant version. I've stamped the flower image with Versamark and then sprinkled the Tempting Turquoise and Melon Mambo embossing powders on. To stop the colours mixing, I stamped the images one at a time, added the powder and stamped again. then heat set. Next is the Melon Mambo version:
Now, where did I leave that feather boa... The Divas fly again tomorrow e'en in McGeough's Bar, Roden Place, Dundalk as part of the Open Mic night - woohoo!
To verify the saga of Megan and Jeff, the Times assigned both Deputy Metropolitan Editor Wendell Jamieson and City Room Bureau Chief Andy Newman, who conducted "days of reporting and interviews."
Invalidating seeks to distort or undermine the recipient’s perceptions of their world. Invalidating occurs when the abuser refuses or fails to acknowledge reality. For example, if the recipient confronts the abuser about an incident of name calling, the abuser may insist, “I never said that,” “I don’t know what you’re talking about, “ etc.
“The best place for a child is in a stable, permanent home. That is our goal for each of the 4,150 children in foster care available for adoption. Joining a family should not be delayed because only one person in the entire state can authorize a child’s adoption or guardianship,” Corrigan said.
Between 1861 and 1862, Ellen was engaged by the Royalty Theatre in London, managed by Madame Albina de Rhona, where she acted with W. H. Kendal, Charles Wyndham and other famous actors.
Really ugly. This footstool was a freebie from a yard sale and was in need of some love. McKenna had been dragging it around the house and using it to climb up on things since we moved in November.
Not that I could say.
Typical Durban mentality dictates that as Durbanites we hate Durban, we hate who ever runs the city and we hate anyone from Joburg. I fear this will never change. Never has the jean pant and the orange croc seen such exposure. You will never understand the hilarity and the enjoyment we get from seeing the Afrikaner mother dragging her mullet sporting 3 year old along the beachfront from Milky Lane to Wimpy.
3. This Song is For the Birds
Imogen was therefore delighted when my friend Tanya came by on Sunday to get footage for her Dumping Stephen Harper video and she, Imogen, was included in the filming. Even more delighted was she when the video was posted. Imogen opens the video:
The next phase in Europe now moves to a crisis called ClubMed, doubts about the structure of the Union as a whole, economic stagnation hitting big non-ezone member the United Kingdom, and Chinese retrenchment acting as a likely catalyst for slump.
As much as I think Dawkins could have done better, his critics have resorted to the most shoddy counter-arguments I have seen outside of a high school novice debate round.
As an avid reader and a huge fan of mobile technology, I couldn’t resist getting a device. And last year, when Chapters Indigo began selling the Kobo at a really affordable price (and with tons of content for the Canadian market, unlike the Kindle!), it was on my wish list. The Kobo Wifi was full of bugs and not at all a good experience for reading periodicals like magazines and books (see a full review on my Business Blog). But for someone who goes through several books a month, it was amazing.
But why is the rum gone?
''The state of Israel is too dear to me to stop working for its interests,'' Ms Livni said before handing her letter of resignation to the Speaker.
Liars.
Please leave one comment per entry or if you choose to put them all in one comment, please clearly list how many entries you have -- either way would be easier for me, thanks! :)
There are a number of questionable aspects to the payments-chief of which is that they are indisputably meant to pressure the voters to vote for a particular candidate, with the cashing of the 1st payment in cheque conditioned upon the victory of the candidate concerned. We also discovered that there are cheating involved in many cases where some of the payments in multiple cheques bounced due to probably deliberate misspelling of the name of recipients. We had earlier disclosed a case in Rh Kuching in the same constituency where a cheque of Rm5000.00 bounced. The claim by Mr Joseph Mauh that the payments were for transport subsidy simply does not conform to the facts deduced from the above material evidence and the more credible account given by our local observers.
On the bare platform. What I saw
Escaping the pool party with Mary for an hour of successful shopping in Lake Geneva.
Registration is currently open. To register for the conference please click on the following link – http://ocs.aishe.org/index.php/international/2011/schedConf/registration
(c) Their future.
to stand
So who is he and what exactly did he say?
8 turned
Does my day get thrown off kilter because unexpected things get tossed my way. Don’t worry — it’s covered!
Spices (Group A and group B)
Ages: 2 to 4
On another challenge, it is my challenge over at Just Us Girls - a color challenge of; Lime Green, Hot Pink and Orange. Good grief, I don't know what it is about me and the BRIGHT colors lately, but I am totally loving these hot colors!
As our bathroom project starts to show a little light at the end of the tunnel, I thought I'd give you a glimpse into what we are working with.
Johannesburg - Taxpayers will spend at least R1.3m a year on suspended national police commissioner Bheki Cele's salary, according to reports on Sunday.
I pretty much want all of these :) what about you?
I think you should alway take your phone with you. So many things could happen where you would need to call someone and have them come help you. All the “what ifs,” what if you fall, get bit by a dog, get lost, or get a cramp. The list is endless but in this day and age it’s just plain stupid to put yourself in a situation like that and not be able to get the help you need.
Last night was the first game without Derrick Rose in the playoffs and they were missing him. They had Derrick Rose come out with the game ball at the start of the game to have the crowed be hyped for the game. That was working for the team for the first half only.
In a small rural village, someone is murdering young pre-adolescent boys. The Carabinieri are stood almost helpless as they have a hand full of suspects ranging from the village idiot, to the witch who roams the landside, to the shaman who taught her his magic. A curious journalist arrives in the village and together with a somewhat strange choice of companion, starts to poke around the case, coming to a shocking conclusion about the killer’s identity.
I have checked in on other bloggers, but since hubby's laptop is cranky, it didn't let me comment, so I've been more of a lurker than follower...
An artist friend I have known for some years has kindly loaned for two days only a beautiful piece from his yet to be released collection based on Russian, Greek, and Italian Icons.
Yes, it is. I lived there for 30 years and haven’t come close to seeing it all. But I think achieving that would take more than one lifetime. For now, this is a lovely reminder…and a great way to showcase Oregon’s beauty to people who have never been there.
Since the Morgan drama that I posted about in the last entry there has been some new developments, namely that there is a good chance she will be getting sold soon and will be leaving the barn. The news took me completely by surprise and I was pretty upset about it at first. I'm alright about it now, it's not like I wanted her to stay forever and become a lesson horse, plus she's going to be a 13 year old girl's horse so hopefully she will be spoiled and loved.
2) Comment here on this blog post (below) and LEAVE YOUR E-MAIL ADDRESS. I can't choose you if you don't leave it. Please limit yourself to one comment.
It's quite known, that I love traveling in Taiwan. It's a beautiful country with so much to discover, it's a pleasure to promote this travel destination to the world. I usually focus on the good things, I'm the type to see the positive rather than the negative. Nevertheless, there are some things that I saw during my extensive traveling around the island, where I would not mind a little change. Don't see this as criticism, see it as a comment from an European traveler, who has a different background and different expectations. Maybe this can serve as a good reference to those, who need this kind of feedback. Here is a brief overview:
half a large onion, thinly chopped
2 incubator
And the wrong one I have chose
Cree-inspired designs and colors to capture the spirit of the legends
Dear Friend
Then Nathan told David: “You are that rich man! Now listen to what the LORD God of Israel says to you: "I chose you to be the king of Israel. I kept you safe from Saul and even gave you his house and his wives. I let you rule Israel and Judah, and if that had not been enough, I would have given you much more. Why did you disobey me and do such a horrible thing? You murdered Uriah the Hittite by having the Ammonites kill him, so you could take his wife.”
Twine from Timeless Twine in Aqua
My mixed up little lilac is ready to bloom again--I think I like its tenacity. It bloomed in August, too. It was strangely wonderful to be surprised by that sweet scent in the relative warmth of summer, and now we're ready to do it again. I looked it up and learned that the word is remontant, as in remontant flowering. It is not uncommon for shrub-like plants that normally bloom in the spring to jump to life in the fall. There's something about fall weather that awakens blooms that were set early in the spring. I think there must be a life lesson here, either for those who bloom unexpectedly or for those who are surprised by sudden beauty. What do you think? (Smile) See you on Tuesday.
Politics is about compromise but with the opposition troika, this ingredient appears to be lacking.
I am sorry if I got to you late... but I did get to everyone and was loving all the wonderful STYLISH projects. Thanks for sharing part of you with us!
Now that she couldn’t even stand on her swollen, biting feet, Kathleen spent every day wrapped in the musty afghan, watching TV and trying not to think about everything. On good days she could stand, on bad ones she could barely keep her eyes open. She waited for rare chances to smile, like when Nate wasn’t rushing off to soccer or cello lessons and would regale her with stories of his sixth grade classroom. There was no clock in the room so she kept time by listening to the world above, the rumble of the school bus coming for Nate, the clanking of the mailman against the old red mailbox nailed to the fresh paint of their prefab, the stomping of Claire’s husband’s boots in the foyer when he returned from work. She’d watch the sun’s light shift from orange to yellow back to orange then to blue through the tiny rectangular window above her. People always assume that when the doctor gives someone only a week or two to live they’d make the most of it, but that’s not always the case. Kathleen spent hours watching game-shows and crime dramas, dreaming of the house she’d left rotting two hours of country roads away.
by Christopher Haskell
We decided to go on hiatus last fall when our guitarist David Wyatt became a dad. The plan was to start playing again after SXSW, but as anyone who’s ever tried to restart a coordinated, collective effort with no reward beyond the doing knows, inertia is a formidable foe.
For nature watching you need a decent pair of binoculars and those tiny ones won't do - if you want to save weight, buy a monocular (try here) - they are way better for kids too. Most identification guides are too large and complex for practical use in the field so I often use the Collins mini gem series - no, they aren't perfect, but better to have something that might actually be opened. Back at home I have a comprehensive library of guide books. What I use more than anything is my digital camera which is fantastic for snapping wild flowers, trees, even birds - I'm not looking for composition, just to identify them later.
The current trend in education is the use of common assessments, even common lesson plans and pacing calendars so that all teachers of the same subject basically teach the same thing at the same time. I am concerned about this trend because it restricts the freedom of teachers to make certain decisions about what happens in their classrooms. I also find it particularly troubling in that it is assumed that the proper learner outcomes and assessments are already in place, which may not be the case.
Carolyn Mohler-Kraft makes fabulous house plants--we just met in person at the show--but have been email buddies for a while. I am hoping to add her work to my collection sooner rather than later. You can see it here: http://www.carolynmohlerkraft.com/.
The rest of the yard is in need of TLC and there is always a list of things to get done. It's nearing the end of the school year so the classroom requires lots of attention. Student artwork goes to the lighthouse gallery over the summer and grades will need to be presented. We will be participating in a schoolwide theater project the next to last week of school that ends with a community performance. I'm really looking forward to that!
I continue to pray for you and your intentions and I know you are doing the same for me. God bless all of you and thank you for the gift of your friendship and encouragement. I thank Theresa especially for the courage to take this step.
Finally, last year at this time, I wasn’t suffering from bouts of depression. My mental health was stable and life was very good. This year has been a struggle with job loss and other stresses but I’m on my way back to this happy girl.
At almost the last minute, Sarn flew in with a really clean and straightforward card, which you can see here - lovely sentiment, backing paper and a punched flower. All co-ordinated beautifully in white, turquoise and mauve - last I saw she was dejectedly picking up left over sweetie wrappers all on her lonesome :) Thanks for getting here Sarn - much appreciated!
Discussing her role, Lauren says, “I play a girl named Rhea, whose a very talented and determined dancer but dancing for all the wrong reasons. Throughout the film she breaks free from the pressures of what everyone else wants and expects from her and finds her own passion and love of dance. Along the way her teachers and fellow dancers help guide her through this transformation.”
where the line disappears.)
Hope you are all doing well. :)
I've been waiting to debut Jack's newest form of art. You may remember his grip tape wallets and colorful quilt patterns. He's taken up sketching! Here are some of my favorites from his sketch book.
Shockingly, contestants who talk about being completely inactive sometimes for years have to attest that they are “in excellent physical health”. And while the Times got some tidbits — contestants apparently work out in as much clothing as possible when the cameras are off — few were willing to talk. After the paper started digging around, former contestants were emailed a reminder of the serious consequences that come with unauthorized interviews: fines of $100,000 to $1 million.”
Tiki’s greatest fear suddenly becomes all too real: the fey have returned to London seeking revenge. As war escalates in the Otherworld, Queen Victoria’s youngest son, Prince Leopold, is attacked. In order to protect her family and the ones she loves, she needs to know the meaning of an fáinne sí, the birthmark that winds around her wrist. But will Tiki be brave enough to face the truth?
Bottom Line: If you are serious about your relationship- Get Married if that is what you both want! If you avoid it, she may find someone else to replace you. DO THE RIGHT THING!
Winners, feel free to grab your badges (right click & save onto your computer), and wear them proudly :)
i just sat and read. the same sentence. twelve-hundred fucking times. it was nothing short of impossible me to concentrate on reading anything when my father was dying six floors above me.
Not many more weeks left of this challenge and boy has it been harder than I imagined. Having said that though I have learnt a lot more, slowed down, worked on my composition and started to train my eye - so it has been a very worthwhile venture.
Annie put on her mask, crouched down into en garde position, and did something she had not done that evening, something she had not expected to happen, something she certainly felt surprised her coach, something she suspected disapointed her father. She lost. Quickly, decisively, Rex landing his first hit with a lazy lunge that was hardly more than a feint, his second coming off a riposte from her attack that was so poorly planned, so totally telegraphed, that Annie did not recognize her own actions, as if it were Butch or Kassandra or some other novice fencer rather than herself.
Tomorrow is my favorite holiday. What holiday? … you may say. Cinco De Mayo! There’s just not much better than a day celebrating freshly made margaritas, chips & salsa, guacamole, and my favorite … sopapillas! So let’s celebrate … why not?!!!
To give you a good idea of the layout of the closet, you basically open the door in the center and it goes back about two feet on each side of the door. Each side has a rod for hanging coats and a shelf above that and the center is filled with 4 coat hooks. We thought of some different ideas on how to best use this space (with kids, we're only going to keep collecting more and more hats, gloves and coats) but settled on creating a series of drawers and shelves on one side of the closet (removing the rod) and leaving the other side as is with the rod and shelf. We may decide to do something different on the other side but for now we'll see how we like the drawers and shelves first.
The leaves
"I'll answer the question Taslin asked. That's all." There was no helping it; with Dora stood below him on the slope, he had to bow his head to look at her, and combined with his clenched jaw the effect left him sounding sullen again.
Soft, textured and creamy with some rich citrus and a leafy herby character.This is a big, textured Sauvignon supported by just enough acidity and freshness to balance the richness and the delicate toasty oak notes. A beautifully concentrated wine that puts me in mind of great white Bordeaux rather than any other take on Sauvignon Blanc – 91/100 points.
I feel so blessed to have found this. Or rather, that it found me. Or maybe… that I stumbled into it blindly and with little gumption. However I came to it, I’m so thankful and I can’t wait to see where it all leads.
Gregory: I see
'That's an elementary mistake,not checking and double checking your quantities'
One thing that makes Mint.com so great is its ability to pull all of your financial information into one place. This lets you see your entire financial picture.
Hey look, Three-and-a-Half is back in our lives. And he's still an asshole.
The new Mi CAS es su CAS challenge is out.....make a card by using one or more words that you can refer to an animal. It is a fun challenge but I think it is always difficult to make a clean and simple card.
There is no series for which I would rather have written a commentary on Hebrews than the NICNT. This classic series has the reputation for solid scholarship as well as for readability. It is respected by scholars and useful to pastors. Professor Gordon Fee, the NICNT editor, insisted that exposition be engaging and that scholarship serve the purpose of clarifying the meaning and relevance of the Biblical text. I am thankful that he edited this volume before his retirement because I have benefited significantly from his emphasis on clarity of style and economy of expression. I found him to be a most gracious person and a firm, but helpful, editor. I am especially grateful that such an outstanding New Testament scholar has so strongly commended the final product.
I got one extra meal for Maggie which she greedily devoured when I got home. It was a supreme treat for her and she wasn’t expecting it. It didn’t start to rain until about 30 minutes after I got home. We got quite a lightning and thunder show with very little rain and wind. And then the heavens opened up…
In 9th century England the Anglo-Saxons honoured King Winter or King Frost. Welcoming him as a personage or deity was believed to make the season less harsh on them. With the arrival of the Vikings to the British Isles during the 9th and 10th centuries Odin, their chief god, influenced the winter gift practices. Odin had twelve different characters and the December character was known as Yalka or Jule – this month was thus called Jultid (our Yuletide). The Vikings believed that Odin visited earth during this time on Sleipnir, his eight-legged horse. He would be disguised in a long blue hooded cloak and carrying a staff and a satchel of bread, accompanied by a raven or crow. He was said to join groups around their fire and listen to their conversations to see if they were content. He would sometimes leave the bread as a gift at poor homesteads.
Lime Curd
“While some junior partners made as little as $300,000 a year, other partners were pulling down $6 million or $7 million, according to former and current partners.”
However, with all of the craziness, life has actually somehow allowed me a little time to start sewing again. I've started back up with our Quiet Book pages, I am currently working on pages O and P, and they are FUN!
It seems to me that the issue does little other than to inflame the fears and prejudices of the majority for no good purpose.
#1 Pet Sematary
Picked up a six-pack of Three Floyds Gumballhead with the groceries this week. Gumballhead has much more body than I remember and almost zero perceived bitterness. I picked it up thinking it was a good summer beer, but I think I really prefer something drier like a saison-style ale, or as it turns out, the Powerhouse Pale Ale from my local Rock Bottom.
Wrap your head around that!
Anyway, I still have my EffortlessCool Twitter and InstaGram, so here’s a few snippets of what I’ve been showcasing there (also because I’ve had no one to help me take outfit photos in weeks).
I hope that John Piper’s ministry blesses you and draws you ever nearer to Christ. Have a blessed evening, my dear reader!
Interesting times,.......and I already have Seasons 1 & 2 cued up on my Netflix que.
I was really annoyed by Elizabeth Rosenthal's article in the Sunday Times, which led with this sentence: "In a quarter-century, at the rate Nigeria is growing, 300 million people — a population about as big as that of the present-day United States — will live in a country roughly the size of Arizona, New Mexico and Nevada." OMG! Can you imagine! I have visions of everyone from New York City crowded into Area 51, the population of Los Angeles stuffed into the Gila Wilderness, and the residents of New Jersey overflowing the Grand Canyon.
Happy loves to be in the garden with you when you work or even water. It makes no difference who is in the garden,, she is out there supervising!!!!!
As a writer, I tend to read a lot, though my genre choices seem to fluctuate between extremes like classic literature (Jane Austen, Faulkner, etc) and young adult fiction. Two very different ends of the spectrum.
He can’t place the villager’s voice. He nods anyway, sure that whoever it is can’t see him. Mesdan wonders whether or not there’s anything really there, or if it’s simply the dream shell’s hypnotic influence plaguing him still. His whole body aches from his ordeal the night before.
Just as I had imagined or created depending on how one views life, as soon as we move back to Bellingham life blossomed. Don't get me wrong for a second, I do miss the sun, bikinis, sagebrush, the Columbia River and a few very special people that call Eastern Washington home; my heart is at home in the trees.
In 1954 Kraft was named by the Junior Chamber of Commerce as one of the Ten Most Outstanding Young Men in America, along with such contemporaries as Robert Kennedy and Chuck Yeager. And for good reason: His illustrations had appeared on the covers of Fortune, Time and other national magazines. His 10-ton sculpture of a laughing elephant graced a Detroit shopping center. And his surrealistic paintings had been favorably received in New York, Los Angeles, London, Paris and Rome. But Kraft was more than a prolific artist. He befriended art lovers, whom he cultivated with a beguiling charisma.
"Alright, we have to make sure." i prompted. "Let me hit you with something."
Yesterday the secret tunnel between London and Brooklyn was completed. This morning the extraordinary optical Telectroscope was installed at both ends -- and for the first time ever, people saw right through the Earth from London to New York and vice versa.
Corruption eats away at money. Teachers are poorly trained and challenged by a constantly shifting curriculum. Schools are often shut by teachers' strikes.
It's in the urge that makes them
Bushmills whiskies are produced and aged at Ireland's oldest working distillery, located County Antrim, Ireland. The company is owned by Diageo, the international spirits company.
P.S. The winner of Lorna Seilstad's book, The Ride of Her Life is Naomi. You'll be hearing from Lorna soon. And I will be away for a couple of weeks. Carol Cox has agreed to step in for me and I've asked her to share some interesting tidbits about her new book, Love in Disguise.
Teal: Miles 23-25.5, I made it over! A 5k left!! I am seriously in my head going, “you will finish this, who cares what the time is just finish.” I had been back and forth with the 4:30 pacer for a while and had seen them again here. That 4:30 pacer lady was nuts so I tried the best I could to stay with her to hear her stories but I lost them. I saw Ted & Kimberly around here and their cheers were seriously awesome. Ted as like “you’ve got this, just keep going!” I’m dying for real here. I was not able to open my food so I have only eaten twice and the first time didn’t really count. I’m starving, freezing, and my feet seriously are killing me. I’m thinking this is the home stretch why do I not have a second wind? Why am I not excited. This crap sucks. Why is no feeling I thought I would have coming to me?
What Joyce is said to have done is a disgrace — anyhow, I hope he never sets foot in Westminster again.
Um, do you?
Presenter: Greg Bawden & Stephen Wihak
The following month, this story appears in the magazine Simplicissimus. And, a few weeks later, the writer receives from a person unknown to him, a painter by the name of Hocker, the following letter:
8:15pm: Shower
Also, I had visited over at Alex's blog, You Had Me At Craft, and seen this wonderful Palm tree diaper cake. I done my own little tweeks to it and here is what I came up with. Thank you Alex!!!! I used a carpet tube for the trunk of the tree and made two circles out of cardboard to form the base to put the diapers around.The stones are 4 bags from the Dollar Tree and I just used constructions paper for the bark and leaves. The monkeys are from Michaels. Approx. 104 size 4 diapers were used.
P.S. My love affair with my new camera continues hot and steamy - and, it must be said, at times a bit blurry. Come back tomorrow for some photos from a train, from a plane, and using film grain. (See what I did there - I made a rhyme so that it would seem that inflicting my holiday snaps is really somehow literarily legitimate ...)
Tata, which completed the sale of its Teesside Cast Products site in Redcar to Thai steel firm SSI earlier this year, launched a 90-day consultation with unions before the redundancies will start.
Patrice Connelly is the Curatorial Associate for BMO Financial Group’s Corporate Art Collection where she crafts catalog texts describing and contextualizing the art works in their holdings. She has been contributing freelance art exhibition reviews to NewCity since 2008.
- Phantom of the Opera
It’s a sad, sad night, down at Vicky Park
Although she and Jude have only just met, he feels startlingly familiar. Despite her fierce loyalty to Damen, Ever is drawn to Jude, a green-eyed golden boy with magical talents and a mysterious past. She’s always believed Damen to be her soul mate and one true love—and she still believes it to be true. But as Damen pulls away to save them from the darkness inhabiting his soul, Ever’s connection with Jude grows stronger—and tests her love for Damen like never before…
The story starts with the Vampires having taken most, if not all of Europe and Connected Asia. They made it to the East Coast of the United States and the assault on the country has begun. New York City has fallen and the tendrils are stretching westward from the coast. We are in a small town in New Jersey on the first night of the onslaught of the vampires.
She answered immediately.
Finally I got around to scrapping the pictures and I love how it turned out. I was seriously intimidated by the fact that the pictures were very yellow and yellow is not a colour I wear, have in my house or like to scrap with., which is funny considering I love yellow. It is such a happy cheerful colour. I found the patterned paper on the bargain table at Scrap Therapy where we scrap and it was perfect for the page, and it was cheap too :D
Sometimes: I try to quit smoking
I have. I miss my sister.
You do not need fancy photoshop programs to do these editing features. Both Photobucket and Shutterfly have wonderful and robust editing options these days. I use them both at times if I need a tweak to a photo and do not have my photoshop program available.
friend to follow a rule.
The 12 companies which have signed the COSIA Charter are: BP Canada Energy Company, Canadian Natural Resources Limited, Cenovus Energy Inc., ConocoPhillips Canada Resources Corp., Devon Canada Corporation, Imperial Oil, Nexen Inc., Shell Canada Energy, Statoil Canada Ltd., Suncor Energy Inc., Teck Resources Limited, and Total E&P Canada Ltd.
Angus was a happy little boy who only ever cried when he was hungry or in pain. This morning he woke up and Paul got up to him and gave him his bottle. I was heading down to coffee morning after I dropped Charlotte off at kindy. I was sitting talking to some girls when Angus spewed all over me and was really not himself. He was pretty sleepy all day. He had a docs appointment which I nearly cancelled but ended up taking him anyway. I was told to keep an eye on him and if he was to get any worse to call them back. He didn't get any better and started to get diahorrea aswell as the vomiting. I rang back and was told to take him to the hospital if he gets any worse.
The Florida shop is cleaned out, most of our house work is completed, and we just got word that we were accepted into three fall shows.
Biographical analysis
For those who haven't looked at Gamma World in a while, here's what its second edition rulebook (which was current at the time this article was written) has to say about new body parts:
Save Our Schools and other teacher groups organized a march on Washington, a four-day affair to get attention to problems in schools and gain support for education-favorable solutions.
D The owl
in the past week, i have become more and more aware of how loved i am by people here, and how quickly i have built a home in a place that was recently so frighteningly new.
I have loved raspberries passionately since I was a child. This is common knowledge if you’ve ever eaten fruit with me, or heard me reminisce about trips to my grandparents’ farm in Ohio – which had a bank of raspberry bushes in the front yard. (Even twelve years and several hundred chigger bites later, nothing beats the taste of those raspberries, picked fresh and popped immediately into my mouth while the juice stained my hands.)
An episode of Fairly Legal really got to me. It was about women who were best friends and then the one friend moved on and changed and made new friends. The one left behind felt left out and when she confronted her ex friend was told--"I changed and you refused to. You would have been included in my new group if you were willing to change to fit in, but you did not want to".
Arthur my little terrorist was watching the snowflakes while I made my bed. This week he really kept us busy ! First he decided not to eat the posh Hill's food anymore, but to vomit it just besides my bed. When I got up, I cheerfully stepped into the vomit with my bare foot. Nice morning greeting ! and this before my cup of coffee ! A crime.
Humans have been enchanted by anything that glitters and sparkles since the beginning of time. Ancient tribes and cultures have adorned themselves with pretty jewels and metals throughout history, but where and when did the customs of the engagement ring and wedding band start?
I actually bought this book over a year ago now, after it had been shortlisted for last year’s Orange Prize, and for some reason it has taken me until now to read it! I loved the idea of the novel – of getting a glimpse into the mind of a hermaphrodite, of which I knew very little about.
Anthea Jeffery holds law degrees from the University of the Witwatersrand and from Cambridge, and a doctorate in human rights law from the University of London. Her previous books include 'The Natal Story: Sixteen years of conflict' and 'The Truth about the Truth Commission'. Both books have been acclaimed for their meticulous and objective approach, and for breaking new ground on important and contentious issues.
My sympathy for her stemmed from the fact that she had to perform her song and dance on a panel that consisted of people whose livelihoods are made on Wall Street. People who live how markets function and work each and every day!
-IYP (Invite Your Partner) swap item to finish
So, when we had a package to be delivered this past Monday and it was a no show, I was floored. I diligently entered the tracking number, and at last check, it was in the Maryland depot.
*Trace* or *Archi-Trace* is a Derridian Concept,
For movie stores, head towards the Adult film section. Even if it is crowded, who are they to judge? And who knows? Maybe you will get them to leave and go look at proper movies. They may thank you in the end. You may still be labeled as a pervert initially by other onlookers, but once they see you have not picked up anything to buy or rent, they’ll forgive you and figure you’re just curious. Again, you will avoid the 'gross' label. If there is no Adult section, go with the kids cartoon section, applying the "library/bookstore kids poop their pantsalot" technique.
Position Description: The internships would take place at the offices of SpotLightSeattle/Connie Blumenthal either at their downtown Seattle office, or at their office on Mercer Island. The internship will focus on, among other things, marketing, writing, strategy, social media and media outreach. There would also likely be some administrative components. The internships would be unpaid and for school credit, and can be flexible in terms of time of year, scheduling and length of internship.
At my house we also use an iPad. We do use it to learn and go online, but mostly we play the games. There are some educational games and there are real fun games. My Mom is bringing our iPad to different schools to make presentations to the kids about the iPad. She teaches them how to use it, and sometimes she even lets them play on it. iPads are a great piece of technology and I think everyone should have one!
It happened today. I have no explanation. I didn't even see it coming.
looking towards the stove end of the kitchen
The fist of God needs to be lowered on Kevin Smith’s career.
Cooking Process:
Speaking of pictures, I am paralyzed by Picnik going away. I haven't yet found an online photo editor I like as much. Not sure what to do? If you have any good suggestions, feel free to share.
when your son throws a temper tantrum
In the year 2011,
Why? Because I was constantly distracted by the sound of the waves and
Egypt, Jordan and Syria miscalculated so badly that Israel’s defensive attack originally pushed the Egyptian Army back to the Suez Canal and threatened Cairo, while Jordan’s West Bank territories were over-run and Syria lost the Golan Heights. But, when I hear the words “Golan Heights”, I don’t think “wantonly occupied by Israel”, my memory is of the Syrian Army pouring heavy artillery shells down onto the farmland of northern Israel from the heights before the Six Day War started.
Six of the men arrested in Oxford earlier this week as part of an investigation into a child sex ring have been charged with offences ranging from rape, conspiracy to rape and having sex with a child to trafficking, arranging child prostitution, supplying drugs and making threats to kill. They are:
Fifteen or twenty minutes later, my husband calls and they finally made it to the finish by subway. I literally outran them. We meet up and I get a "good job" hug.
a reminding smile
Here is a selection of some fresh produce we purchased last year:
Then, too, Americans like raising children, have a strong, commonly shared moral code, and religious values. According to a recent Pew Global Attitudes survey, about sixty percent of Americans think religion is “very important.” A Marxist will never understand this.
You can read more in my blog http://franwest2.blogspot.com. There are plenty of stories, photos and videos. Products can be ordered from this website as well.
HDTV Budget Range – What Can You Expect to Get For Your Money?
So the thing is, I have been waking up and getting really bad nausea. I thought, maybe it's all the medications I need to down for my bronchitis... or am I pregnant??? Hey, it could happen, pills are not so effective, most of all if you have been working overtime and getting home late, you tend to forget to take them as usual...
Or at the casement seen her stand?
I predict 32.020 days to get from 350,000-400,000.
Flair said that Garrett has stumbled into this promo, and to every single person in the ring, Eric Bischoff is responsible for all of them being in TNA.
Labour Ex-councillor Kyle-Noel Taylor
It’s my pleasure today to donate $100 to welcome a few more Solar Suitcases into the world (they cost about $1,000 apiece) – and hopefully deliver hundreds more happy birth days to women I’ve never met. To join me, click here!
Charlie Daniels – Guitar
Each week we are apparently going to reduce our product by one more, and add in replacement foods, until we are off product and eating approximately 1200 calories. (Although I think if you really want to, you can continue to order and eat a few products – but don’t think that will be me.) It will be so weird grocery shopping again, and preparing food – and eating it!
I've just found this old ass necklace, it's probably fifteen or 14 years old or something. We had the Spice Girls back in the 90's but since I'm from '93 I was a little young to enjoy the culture that was and is the Spice Girls. But of course, having an older sister who's six years older than me, I grew up with the Spice Girls. Songs like Stop right now, spice up your life, who do you think you are, viva forever, say you'll be there, 2 become 1... lots of awesome songs that I probably still know by heart. Also, I can remember my sister having the most awesome lollipops in the world with Spice Girl wrappers and I think chewing gum inside or something? It's amazing how you can still remember these silly little things. My favorite Spice Girl was baby spice, Emma. She was and is such a cutie, maybe it was an early girl crush I had. :-D Now that I think about it, the nineties were full of awesome girl bands. Spice Girls, TLC, Destiny's child and I'm thinking that the Sugababes also came in the late 90's (I'll throw No Doubt in there too because of the strong female vocalist). Just from the top of my head, some of their songs were of course about being in love and digging on dudes but a lot of songs were also about female independence and growing up with that music was pretty cool. I kind of miss cool girl bands. :-(
I promise to update this, this week.
“No this is all psychic communication – spooky.” I say
Obviously, you have two options: make pizza at home or go out. Personally, I like making pizza at home because you have more control and the risk of cross-contamination is far less. Here are the at-home options I’ve tried and how it went.
But even in this day and age, there are a few developers that go against the grain and try to make a good licensed game, such as Junction Point Studio’s recent effort, “Epic Mickey”. Unfortunately, even with all the love and care put into it, the game garnered mixed reviews with most of the criticism geared towards the in-game camera and controls. So even today, it remains as challenging as ever to make a good licensed game, especially amidst titles that sport cutting-edge graphics, stories, and characters.
The funny part is that he claimed that he told me months ago. That is that I guess he told me in passing as he told Dreamer at his house weeks ago. I would say I wasn't paying attention however he does claim that I said something along the lines of "That's Nice". I still say that I actually wasn't listening but whatever it's not a huge deal.
-FW
Having completed and fully annotated Ehrman’s new book Did Jesus Exist? The Historical Argument for Jesus of Nazareth (Harper 2012), I can officially say it is filled with factual errors, logical fallacies, and badly worded arguments. Moreover, it completely fails at its one explicit task: to effectively critique the arguments for Jesus being a mythical person. Lousy with errors and failing even at the one useful thing it could have done, this is not a book I can recommend.
After egg is glued in you can add more nesting as needed.
You can see the awning , because of the wires, sticks away from the house..
For example you could choose the morning cartoon, or you would set the table.
Lunch: Cheese, crackers, fresh fruit & veggies
You need to find some balance in life don’t you? Perhaps it’s time to buy some fuckin’ new shoes then?
2). Unlike the Secret Service, Young isn’t employed by a government agency under the authority of the President.
Here is what MacDonald is after: If there is no correlation, as she states, then fighting crime can only be done by the police and the penal system. This is the conservative answer to crime, because it relieves the wealthy of their guilt toward the disadvantaged, and justifies their urge for retributive justice.
Certainly, I understand that, in the case of bars and music, perfection is the enemy of awesomeness. You want a well-lit, acoustically perfect room with good sightlines? Go to Symphony Hall. Any first-rate dive needs to be a little rough around the edges, and the Cantab has raised roughness to an artform. Everything about the place, from the faux stonework of the exterior façade to the musty aroma of the basement carpet proclaims an absolute nonchalance reminiscent of the young Brando.
and focusing until you have concluded that the person is “into you.” This makes the
But I am so looking forward to seeing them! The kiddies will be SO excited to see Grandma and it has been a long time since I have seen my brother. And I like surprise visits.
the good we do … will be rewarded
After a lengthy run playing some sort of music (most recently oldies) as a "full service" station, WHBC turned to talk radio in 2007, including new local shows with Ron Ponder and Sam Bourquin (who took over afternoon drive from Jim Albright, now doing morning drive at Clear Channel talk WHLO/640 in Akron). The changes have been extensively reported in this very blog.
“Well done. You’ve got it. Now you can go home.”
But before I launch into the first review, I thought I'd lay down some house rules and explain exactly how each taste test will be conducted.
- Cardio Trainer (CT)
Sleepless Knight did get some filming done before I disappeared but the weather conspired to stop us from completing it. Still… Kitty got to slap Farnsworth (again) after he descended from half-an-hour atop a freezing pile of rubble (he gets all the fun jobs), Winston the dog ran off into the woods, covered in a paint-stained bed sheet, and the universe almost imploded when myself, Farnsworth, and Richard, all appeared in the same place for the first time since May. A good day was had by all, and the best thing was… we were all there! Everybody turned up at the same time! Let no-one say we don’t have ambition.
Continuing in Luke 12 the parable of the faithful Steward. Yesterday we discussed being watchful to the end and this Parable Peter ask Jesus do you speak this parable only to us or to all people?
A distressed Jenny and our then 11 year old son packed up the Thanksgiving decorations by themselves. They must have been in a fog and stuffed the real pumpkin and gourds in the tote without thinking about it.
I wish I had been right that the troubles of that day would soon be forgotten, but we never really have recovered. I did find another job, but it took four months, and it required us to leave Tennessee for about a third less pay. So in addition to the substantial economic costs, we lost the friends we had made, including my wife’s best friend, and we had to start over in a state where we didn’t know anyone. That’s just a normal part of life, but it was a particularly bitter disappointment in this case, because we were well-off financially and very well-adjusted before, as my four-year-old said, “my job burned up.”
Now you have your invasion type, your invading race, your target area and residents, the speed of the invasion, the goals of the invasion, the incidentals and hopefully a party willing to take on the risk of stopping an invasion, what's left? Well executing it, adjusting it, changing it, reacting to it and enjoying it. Just like any campaign, things will have to be modified, tossed out or added, but give it some time and attention and you will really enjoy it.
For topping:
Trickster: $50 in advance/ $65 at the door
WARNING! THE FOLLOWING MAY BE INACCURATE, BECAUSE I HAVE A TERRIBLE MEMORY!
Summer Squash, one small, cut into small pieces
I’ve a feeling you’re not going to need luck though, because you have bags of talent, dedication and enthusiasm and I’m sure they will bring you the success and recognition you deserve.
This is a PERFECT example of the national impact a California labeling law can, and no doubt WILL, have. While California is the only state requiring the label to state that the product contains the offending ingredient, these companies are switching their formula for the entire US market, rather than have two different labels. According to USA Today:
Covered in Black; An Industrial Tribute to the Kings of High Voltage
It’s the love for health that keeps the sick alive.
Isaacson showed Steve in all of his complex and multi-faceted nature. Sometimes he was kind and understanding; at other times he was as hard as steel, even to close and loyal friends. My attitude toward Steve moved between admiration, dislike, respect and pity. But, in the end, the one attitude that prevailed above the others is admiration. You have to admire a guy that takes an idea, begins working on it in a garage, and develops it into a billion-dollar enterprise.
nor hope, nor faith, nor long-standing grief,
We reiterate our support for the principled and determined actions of UC students and faculty to defend the public character of the UC system against privatization, a goal with which the blockade of the US Bank branch was consistent.
You think you got the best of me
family (tons)
The driver stepped out of the car and dropped down to see one of the helpless officer’s feet partially beneath the rear wheel. He calmly stood and blinked at the police car’s headlights that were still on despite being cracked by the trunk of the Cadillac. The flashing blue and red lights atop the car threw helpless streams of color into the darkness of an empty highway as the man calmly walked around the front of his car and toward the back with his gun in the lead. A weak cry came from the officer as the driver knelt down and took aim beneath the car. Before he could pull the trigger, several teeth on the left side of his mouth were knocked into his throat as a heavy leather boot kicked his face, sending him backwards where he rolled once from the pavement into weeds. He remained face down and mostly motionless except for occasional involuntary muscular twitches.
i'm excited to be enrolled in and ready to start an online workshop... the one that irene nam of shutter sisters teaches every few months. it's her simple soulful photography/writing workshop. i really look forward to all that i will learn there... it is my first online photography workshop of any kind! i will definitely try to post about what i am learning in the class from time to time on this blog. it is only four weeks long, but that will be plenty of time to learn a great deal from a respected photographer teacher and many gifted photographer/blogger peers.
Traverse City, MI 49686 ((231) 922-9642. It is mostly over, but I am sure there will be similar classes in the future. And no, I don't think they don't teach ice-sword fighting skills
3) Tweet, facebook, or blog about this give away and leave a comment letting me know.
Good luck with those! Next time let's talk about combating that biggest of all barriers: Realism!
when we were
(Who knows if Seamus even realized he left such great clues!)
Sports nutrition graduate Jack Watson said: “Bodybuilders will be some of the healthiest people about. This is because they will have such specific diets to give their body high levels of nutrients that the body needs to grow.”
Oct 2 – Slowdown – Omaha, NE (Headlining)
Miss anything? Just feeling normal
The personal responsibility to help yourself and others or the letting someone else do it for you?
famous for his tone clusters, which are featured here as well as
The first attempt to colonize the Boers came with the occupation of the Transvaal by a small British contingent in 1877. This event led directly to the First Anglo-Boer War (note again that it is called an "Anglo-Boer War" and not an "Anglo-Afrikaner War") and by 1881 the British forces had been defeated by the Boers to such an extent that the British were forced to once again recognize the independence of the Boer Republics. This recognition was given formal effect by the London Convention of 1884 - the second time that the Boers had been recognized as an independent and indigenous people in international law.
By the end track, “All A Dream,” we are dazed without a resolution to Jones’ pain. One thing remains clear, however. Like Sidney Brenshaw expounds in the film “Mudhoney,” Jones knows she can never fully detach.
Hugo Boss is one of the top brand names in the world of fashion. While the company is famous for their stylish apparel, Boss watches also offer a certain suave and debonair style that many people appreciate.
However, a creative and unorthodox alternative was suggested, Since many of the residents of Hell’s Kitchen worked in the theater and the arts, which were generally fairly low paying professions, why not reserve the majority of the units in the building for low – income artists and actors. After significant discussions, it was decided that a proposal would be made to the City that the apartments in Manhattan Plaza be reserved for low income tenants qualifying for Section 8 subsidies, 70% of whom worked in some fashion in the arts and the theater, 20% of whom were from the community, and 10% of whom were elderly. The McManus club strongly supported this proposal and Jimmy McManus was the logical person to sell this idea to the Beame administration. McManus. met personally with both Mayor Beame and his deputy Mayor John Zuccoti to see that the proposal, was adopted and implemented. While many have claimed credit for the idea, there is little doubt that Jimmy McManus the old line Tammany Hall leader, who ten years earlier might have been considered a relic of a by gone era was the critical factor in obtaining Mayor al support for this project which would lead the neighborhood in to the future. Ironically, though few realize it, fifteen years after the defeat of Carmine DeSapio and the death of Tammany Hall, John Kelly’s system of a democratic party leader serving as the intermediary between the community and the City government was functioning in Hell’s Kitchen at a much higher and more successful level than it ever had in the 19th Century.
The songs from your first single all made it to the new album. How have they evolved over the last year and a half?
Whisk together the gelatin and cold water in a bowl and let soften.
Mr. H just wrote to say he posted the last of my postcards from Vietnam...all 46 of them.
I own four bottles of perfume – three are branded and one, which is my favourite – was $6. I bought it in the USA a few years ago and it has lasted! I’m not the sort of person who goes in for brands – in fact the perfume is probably the only branded thing that I own. It’s worth the cost…
Chesterton understood the effect we have on others and the world. He realised that the cause of the problems in this world is us. We are the primary destructive force in this world.
This is not a ploy for comments, but obviously I do need you to leave one to be eligible for the prize. You can simply say "hi!" or share how God has helped you or whatever you're comfortable with. Contest ends at 3PM, Thursday, 9/29/11. I will use random.org and announce the winner on Friday, Sept 30. Have a safe and blessed weekend, my friends!
Inside the Gallerie Vivienne. (A gorgeous old arcade we stumbled upon.)
So I must have some sort of marketing agenda to promote my site.
Tip1: When I make a CAS card I use to search for a CAS sketch as a base and add as little embellishments as possible
So next time you are enticed by some “heat gear,” well, go ahead and buy it if you like. But realize you’re paying for marketing and hype.
I also believe we must be more responsible regarding the overpopulation of the earth. We are already seeing problems arise from fights over resources like water and not just in China and India, but here in the U.S. as well. After two children, ALL individuals should be required to undergo mandatory sterilization. The choice of two children replaces the two parents and results in, at best, no population growth. This world is overpopulated already. If a couple wants more children and can afford them and pass the criteria for legal adoption, let them adopt. With all the children in foster homes and orphanages that have no parents and need them, this should be a “non-brainer.”
My sister was kind enough to share her recipe with me this year. Funny thing- the recipe calls for 'vanilla wafers'. I went to the store to get them and on my way down the cookie aisle I saw Nilla wafers. I stopped in my tracks. "Oh, I bet those are what I'm supposed to use!" Can you guess what I was on my way to get? Those little vanilla creme wafers with frosting in the middle. I wonder how that would have turned out. Lots of sugary frosting and not much bulk in the little wafer to hold the cookie together. Whew, cookie failure averted!
Composed By - Billy Bang (tracks: 1, 3, 5), Sirone (tracks: 2, 4, 6)
Ruth - Additional vocals
Into the desert,
01. Rollerdog
The above quote was shared on Twitter, it got caught in my heart and I wanted to share it here as an encouragement to everyone, no matter where you are in life.
Paperback: 256 pages
Before the Mexican Revolution, more than 4,000 Mormons were given refuge in Mexico by dictator Porfirio Diaz, buttressed by ideas of support for religious freedom espoused by Mexico’s founding father, Benito Juarez.
Harvesting student wins requires that teachers put a plan into action and that they remember two things: (1) Recognized behavior gets repeated, and (2) It takes three compliments to one criticism to get positive results (see Rath, 2004). Harvesting student wins is an essential tactic for teachers because it helps them keep the “learning flywheel” moving for every student. WOWMANIA! is one action that can help teachers begin harvesting wins.
My hat is off to all those working moms who take a break every 3 hours, hook themselves up, and spend 15 minutes being milked by a machine! It's so much harder than you'd think and is absolutely something to be commended! I applaud you!
Luckily, Ella and her gang made my job a little bit easier by sticking mainly to the dance floor, while Josh and I lingered by the refreshments. He and I had both acknowledged that we hated to dance, so our game plan was to stay off the dance floor for as long as humanly possible. But inevitably, a slow song came on and Hope and Mason, who’d come to the dance together in coordinating aqua dress and tie, dragged me out with them. Josh trailed behind, offering me a small smile out of the corner of his mouth. Awkwardly, we shuffledour feet to the music, and we wwere left alone as Hope and Mason ducked behind the bleachers for an impromptu makeout session.
I drive up to the off ramp where I have to make a U-turn to get back to the (true) major accident. I get to this U-turn were I see another 4 or so cars involved but there are three bodies lying on the ground. I jump out because I thought someone was dead. I’m trying to check on them when someone who was panicking pulling on me pointing saying the driver drove up that way. The driver had apparently driven up the eastbound lanes of traffic traveling westbound. I quickly check on the 3 people and they had no life threatening injuries. I have to get back to the first accident scene. I let them know I got other units in route.
If you’re a sports fan, you’ve definitely heard of Jeremy Lin. The first Asian-American player in the NBA… or at least the first one anyone ever heard of… and nobody’d even heard of him a month ago.
This paper argues that there is a need to remember that these ‘other places’ of retail matter not just as targets for regeneration projects or ‘historicised pre-war seedy arteries’ from the past but as functioning local places. Tertiarisation of secondary retail locations should be interpreted in terms of the way that it reinforces local high streets and town centres. People express multiple identities in their choice of type and location of shopping and local centres remain important, probably even more so for communities with lower spending power and more limited mobility.
Feminists will have to be careful with “sexism” like that on the loose in English departments! Thanks to the wonders of modern academia, my edition of Paradise Lost comes with an essay Female Autonomy in Milton’s Sexual Poetics which elucidates the dangers (to feminists) of Milton’s work. After all, Eve might have been a lesbian, forced into heterosexuality by the evil patriarchy and rape culture. The important thing to remember is that men are bad.
Then they swarm around me,
Far more deadly even than the ability to distort news coverage has been the overwhelming control which the left have over entertainment, drama, culture and the visual depiction of history, it is through these medium that the last two generations have been taught what to think and what to believe.
How can a tree help me give an inspirational speech on kindness? Reluctantly, I walked towards the old oak tree. I was drawn to the massive trunk. I put my hands on the tree and became very quiet. I could feel the energy of the tree pulsating slow and methodical. The energy was heavy. How could this magnificent beautiful tree have such a depressing energy? I slowly circled around the tree. My hands were still resting upon its trunk. I could hear my guide speaking. “Feel the tree. Feel its soul. Listen to the tree. What is it telling you?”
The effort eats up about 10 percent of the republic’s defense budget. (Macedonia previously contributed about 500 troops to the American-led effort in Iraq.)
Teenage love
I am really in love with the Kate Spade satchel, like I really need another green bag, right? And the arrow necklace is so unique!!! What is your favorite piece on this set?
For a chef anywhere in the world, two books that would fall under the umbrella term of inspiration would be Larousse Gastronomique and Herring’s Dictionary of Classical and Modern Cookery. These two books are the ‘supreme’ commandments when it comes to French Cooking.
Limit your nap to 45 minutes or less, if you need to spring into action after dozing. Otherwise, you may drift into slow-wave sleep. Waking from this stage results in sleep inertia, that grogginess and disorientation that can last for half an hour or more.
PSSHHH.... more like I was totally geekin' out that I got to see both of them!
Young Aucklander Ben Sanders, who juggles novel writing with his university civil engineering studies, burst onto the local books scene last year with The Fallen, a gritty crime thriller that introduced Detective Sean Devereaux and ex-cop John Hale, and was packed with murder, kidnapping, and police corruption. All set amongst the seamy streets and suburbs of our largest city. Now, 21-year-old Sanders returns, as do Devereaux and Hale, with By Any Means, the follow up to his #1 bestselling debut.
Other news, CC officially has an off-duty weapon! He has his duty weapon, but you see, CC is a skinny man! He was having a hard time concealing it comfortably, so he's been on the lookout for a new gun. I think he likes what he ended up with. And he's already bought a new holster and more ammo for this gun (since it's a 9MM and his duty weapon is a .40 caliber) My dad was generous enough to trade in an old antique gun and buy CC a new gun. I think he's excited about it! I'm sure we'll be going back to the range soon so he can get used to it more!
China Village is in a shopping mall with Harvest Market, quite a way down San Marin Road in Novato. The food isn't an upscale Chinese style, but it is fresh and delicious and worth driving a bit extra to enjoy.
Google wants to display the most relevant ads for the user. So… it makes perfect sense that YOU will pay less per click, the higher the click through rate of your ad is.
Telephone ________________ Fax _________________ E-Mail __________________
Simple options are your names, wedding date, a quote or lyric that has meaning to you and your fiance.
She has shown me a wonderful example of how to be a good mom, always putting us first, encouraging us, and doing very little for herself. She’s also a fun grandmommy—just ask my kids!
Once you've stitching around each letter, simply use whichever FMQ design you want, and quilt in and around your writing. The denser the better - this will make the surrounding area flatter, and help your writing 'pop' as much as possible. I've used an echo shell pattern which is really easy to do. There are heaps of styles that would work though (even dense stippling would look great) - a brilliant resource is the Free Motion Quilting Project.
This one, for example. It's the first beast we see,
Sep 15 2008 7:30P The Mint Los Angeles
We know from the Word of God that there will be a one world church and a one world government. This one world government and church is not God’s. We know that the end of days will be marked by deep deception and lying signs and wonders. In fact, the Bible says that the Antichrist will call fire down from Heaven. The Bible also says that God will send a powerful delusion to those that did not love the Truth so that they will believe a lie. If your only basis by which to judge whether a person or ministry is from God are signs and wonders then sadly enough you are already deceived.
Tyler wasn't saying a word he puts me in front of the bed where I normally take down my own pants and panties.. I wasn't today and I think he new that because before I could decide If i wanted to take them down myself or not they came down in a hurry. With a light tap I was bent over.
But, like with Lee Smith, his timing is off. It's not enough to be a very good hitter as a first baseman. No, you have to be extraordinary. And as good as those career numbers look, if you look on this ballot McGriff is at best the fourth most productive first baseman behind Bagwell, Mark McGwire and Rafael Palmeiro. Edgar Martinez was a DH, but if you throw him in this discussion, well, he was a better hitter than McGriff. Don Mattingly's career was too short, but few would say McGriff was as good a player as Mattingly at their best. I wouldn't.
And one more thing. If you make your face more youthful looking with wrinkle creams that gives results, then any make up that you have will be so much more effective.
To say that my child has an expressive face is putting it kindly. She has a scowl like nobody else I know and she doesn’t need to be able to talk yet as her eyes tell it all. When I left her this morning she sat quickly down on the floor with her little mates, looked back at me, scowled, turned back and carried on playing. Well its better than the screamy ab dabs I suppose. Bless her, i’m so glad she’s adjusting but I guess its all part of her ongoing independence.
Look at those pretty red cattle against that green grass!
Food Addiction
I’m not half as unhealthy as you must be thinking – look at this beauty, it’s a pot of Living Lettuce, three different types….yummy!! I just love the colours. One of my favourite salads, come the fine weather, is just green salad and I add everything that I have that is green ie: Lettuce, Cucumber, Spring Onions, Mint and Grapes…it really is delicious and very refreshing. Try it if you have some fine weather it’s beautiful served with a baked Camembert!!
Police are waiting on forensic evidence, but the timing, proximity and preliminary evidence lead police to believe the four incidents are connected.
Nathan H. Gray is Managing Partner of AsiaAustralis. AsiaAustralis is a stategic consulting service partnership established by experienced international management consultants to assist private and public organisations achieve their strategic objectives in trade, investment and government relations throughout the Australasian region with a particular focus on SE Asia. Based in Adelaide, South Australia, AsiaAustralis has a network of associates throughout Australia and Asia that can be called upon to assist and facilitate major projects, business opportunities and government to government trade and investment facilitation. To Contact AsiaAustralis check out the website: www.asiaaustralis.com or send Nathan an email: nathan@asiaaustralis.com
After this show aired, she called and said he could take a DNA test. He had allegedly tried to contact her privately but she wouldn’t respond.
There was no further reply.
Our little Ellie Claire turned one! Even though having two kids has presented it's own challenges, I have to say it's been an absolute joy getting to know this little girl. It's been fantastic watching how she and her brother have grown and the relationship they've built. It's been *so* much fun shopping! LOL I can't wait for all the fun as we work our way towards age 2 (yikes!)
My goal was to just run steady and finish under 9 hours. I wasn't planning on running too hard, just keep moving and get in some long miles towards Arkansas Traveller. The first few miles were mostly in grass about 8 inches long mowed along the edge of a field along side a gravel road. It was required to have a light for the start since the sun wouldn't be up for over 1 hour, so the long grass was foot soaking at the beginning.
MAJOR inspiration pictures from the selby
Observe:
I have dealt with orders for 1896 pound of pecans. This weekend, I will actually sort/touch just about every one of those 1896 pounds.
Tartiflette Savoyarde
I got some interesting stuff out of that early patternings exercise, but most of it reinforced how encouraging of self-expression and creativity my parents have been for me and my siblings growing up. I’m very thankful for that.
With our expert team’s combined experience in graphic design, web development, flash design and E-Commerce solutions, you can be confident that whatever your project demands, our team can deliver on time and in budget.
Myth 4: You lose most of your body heat through your head.
I don’t have a really strong view on whether or not it’s advisable to dispatch a small number of US combat troops to help fight the Lord’s Resistance Army. My instinct is to be skeptical. I want to see less military intervention, not more. But Rush Limbaugh’s instinct is to embrace brutal murderers:
In the scheme of things, ours is not a particularly hectic schedule, but the start of all these activities heralds the fact that the year has started in earnest. No more pussy footing around, writing 09 on your cheques, people. It’s time to get serious.
These were sizable trees, too, many with fruit and buds all over them. I have always wanted to keep some citrus growing through the winter, moving it outside in summer, so how could I resist? I could not resist. I am now the owner of a dwarf Lisbon lemon. It is meant to be grown outdoors, of course, as the instructions make clear. Nothing there about keeping it going inside, but I know it’s possible; many grow citrus indoors.
Oh, and this song makes me smile. Total feel good song.
We can't buy more time 'cause our tender isn't valid
EMPLOYERS: Avoid hiring unlucky people by immediately tossing half the CVs into the bin.
The garden is lush now, the tomatoes this week measured not in numbers but in bucketfuls. The season is changing and mists in the morning on the farm tell me the days of summer are almost gone.
I am not above all of this. I am part of the problem. These past years have not been fun for me and I now can see that the root of the problem has been inside me all along. The anger and viciousness I have hurled at others to express my dissatisfaction with life makes me no better than those people in Prescott. My assertion that other people have it easier than me and that I deserve better means I am just as greedy as BP oil trying to take shortcuts in order to make more money. My speechifying about my greater understanding of the food chain due to my agricultural background still sees me going to the grocery store for the bulk of my meals – despite what I claim to know.
I've cut characters from manuscripts before. Body counts are nothing new for my revision process. But this one hurt more than the others because I loved him so much.
The last appointment of the day was with the rehab specialist. She was very nice and the conversation we had was a good debriefing of the day. She said that even though she isn't a parent to a special needs child, she has gleaned from many interactions with parents that they want their children to be as independent as possible. She reminded us that Olivia is very independent in her mobility, through crawling and being able to drive her wheelchair. She said that as a doctor, she only recommends surgery if there is a high likelihood of providing better/more functionality for the patient. Risk analysis... And the tough part is that, with our mystery girl, there is just no way of knowing what the best option is. Then she said, "It's a leap of faith."
Preheat your oven to 350 degrees, and grease your bundt pan. Set aside.
Cut the Swiss roll into slices and use the slices to line your dish. Spoon the juice from the Raspberries over the Swiss roll and pour a tablespoon of Amaretto (or another liqueur of your choice) over the swiss roll too. Pour over the raspberries, you can squish them into a paste or leave them whole, either is good.
4 - 99% of lawyers give the rest a bad name.
As our first project we went to a Sunday market called Mercado de la Plaza de la Alameda, which is essentially the same thing as a farmer’s market but is more focused on being organic. From the visit we made a photo montage showing the fresh fruit and veggies, nuts, wines and beers and many other organic products.
The thesis that I came to as result of my inquiries is, I believe, of immense interest. It is that the world is going through a new period of change – a New Industrial Revolution – that will have immense ramifications. The opportunities for creating health, happiness and wealth creation from the new era will be spectacular. The social benefits and economic rewards from the emerging epoch will be shared not just by a few countries (as happened in the original Industrial Revolution) but by many.
Our house is a dis-as-ter lately. I just feel like I CANNOT catch up! This is probably largely due to the fact that 98% of my day is still consumed with "Tell me if you have to go potty, okay?" and "Let's go sit on the potty!" basically every 15 minutes to half hour, lol.
The first video below reports that more than 5,000 people attended a rally at UC Davis rally, but a local television station claimed only a couple hundred showed up. The photos included in the first video below tell the truth.
I had come across this photo paper and I thought I would never know what to do with it... Well, I found the perfect project! We have a dog and my son is 11 weeks now. I just know they will get along great when he gets older and had to make a page for all the amazing pictures that will be taken!
And of course there is Lestat. In this version (the Lestat of book The Vampire Lestat is a very different character) Lestat is something you very seldom see in literature: evil for the sake of evil. He’s not a psychotic or a psychopath who doesn’t quite grasp the difference between good and evil. He’s not a sociopath who just doesn’t care. He’s not on a vengeance kick feeling that if he has to suffer then everyone has to suffer. He’s not even really bored. No, he knows he’s evil, he knows good from evil, and it’s not that he doesn’t care; it’s that he delights in being evil. Iago, Ledger’s Joker, Dracula (in the original novel and The Historian), it’s a short list. Knowingly willing evil for the sake of evil. It’s a horrific thought and thankfully something I’m convinced exists only in fiction. But an instructive one to show us what we are not and should not be. It’s all of our worst qualities stripped of all our best qualities, our egos given free reign of madness and evil. Few things are as frightening. (Although even Cruise’s Lestat falls short sometimes of the pure villainy with which Louis imaged him, as when he mentions it’s easier to kill the guilty and his constant complaining about having not being given a choice when he became a vampire).
Physically: Find and purchase __________ snacks with more carbs to prevent headaches and ____________ _____________ each week to prevent colds.
I have mentioned working and needing to do work. I don’t think I have really said what it is I do. I used to work for the big bank and was laid off in late 2010. That was re-classed as retiring. As bad as being laid off was the re-class gave me a few benefits so I was fine with that. I was part of a five percent world wide reduction in force. This actually was a blessing as six months earlier my husband suffered a stroke and twenty days later a heart attack. He needs help and care.
I find that all the answers are correct for the questions asked.
I find this to be a very economical recipe. You probably know dried beans are dirt cheap. I used my homemade vegetable stock that costs literally pennies for a big pot full, so that's a freebie for me. The parsley came from my backyard. I found great deals at the grocery store on all of the vegetables I used in this recipe today. I did spend extra money on organic chicken with no reservations. I fully realize I am paying $10 for a 3 1/2 pound whole chicken when my grocery store puts ones of the same size on sale for $3, but the price difference is more than worth it to me. I will save you a sermon on why organic is the only label on chicken that matters when you are looking for the most healthful option, but I will tell you that Dr. Oz had a great episode about it and let you do your own research. One whole chicken will get us through three meals though, so when I break it down to only $3.33 per meal, it looks even better. Again, I buy organic dairy products whenever possible, and with the cheese as almost just a tasty garnish in this recipe, my bottom line is less than a dollars' worth of organic cheese. Same with the yogurt--I bought organic yogurt and paid considerably more than I would have for the non-organic, but when you break it down to the cost per serving and take the benefits of using organic into consideration, it's more than worth it to me. But of course you will decide what ingredients are right for you, your family and your budget.
Till death part me from you….
Took a break when my uncle came by to visit. Took another break when it was time for dinner. Frozen TV dinner heated by microwave. Tasted like one can expect from such a dish. Not much but at least it was warm. Also had one half of an avocado. That was more to my taste.
Smokie. Somehow it wouldn't feel like TOTP without them. OK, all their records blur into one for me but I don't care. I will never get tired of listening to them.
#3 – I told my boss Monday about what I’ve been going through and our personal hell, why I’ve been the world’s shittiest employee lately etc. He was amazingly supportive, told me I’ve still been doing great, that he is beyond thrilled for me (and that his biggest regret in life is not having children). Then he told me that while he is so excited for me that he will miss me and wishes he wasn’t so damn dependant on me, but that I can come back anytime and that he will make anything work – if I want to work part time, if I want to work from home, they will open a daycare, etc. haha, he was great. And then all this week he’s been joking about how fat I am getting (which is fine, he is totally joking as I am normally skinny but just have this crazy giant twin belly right now – and I know the day I am actually fat he will shut up!). he is also super worried about me walking in heels etc. Too funny.
She reaches for you from the corners.
“This is really weird,” my husband said. “My wife just wrote a book about a young girl who comes out from Ontario to work on the coast and maybe find herself a man.”
HE GHOST OF FEAR AND OTHERS: H. P. Lovecraft’s Favorite Horror Stories edited by S. T. Joshi (Signed Limited Hardcover)
... this, I served on the table.
However, it’s not always so easy for the mom-to-be to tell which position her baby is in at any given moment.
Even after the facts were exposed, this political bigot, Dan Rather, kept foolishly and insanely insisting that the “story was true even if the document wasn’t”? And the sky is pink, although it appears blue?
If you like bridges and circuses this book is worth a look, but get it from the library.
My roommate from last year was over for a few days because we haven’t seen each other in sooo long, and today’s picture was her and I making a heart with our hands (after a super long day of shopping)!
The edifice crumbles slowly and can be repaired, but there comes a point where the fall will be fast and inevitable. Let us as a people awake before we reach that point.
In both countries, the phenomenon is a case of xenophilia. We're fascinated with each other because we're so different.
Then I sat on my hiney for two more days.
As we seek to find an alternative to the discredited corporate capitalist model of enterprise it is vital that we understand clearly the range of options on offer, which is why Nick Clegg's confusing statement about the John Lewis economy is particularly unhelpful.
MonStars on Broadway (Illuminate!, South FL)
"I seek the honored wisdom of The Town Elders."
And I also know He has us here now, for this very reason... to teach others the way to receive that healing and to bring hope to those who have so little.
This morning, I woke and ran excitedly to the incubator to see what had happened overnight. Well, my pip hadn’t progressed, but one other egg had pipped. Slightly distraught, I went on to work. When I called my husband from work for an update, there were 4 pips – but still no chicks. When I called again at 3:15 (the poor man), he said the first pip was zipping.
NNO March 1 at 9:41pm
The auto installation might sometimes go wrong and might download some add-on which are not at all required.
I still have no clue.”
Okay, if you got this far, now it’s your turn. Answer some or all of the questions, either in the comments below, or in your own blog post (post the link in the comments)! I’d like to hear what YOU have to say about books and reading.
202 dazed and confused
BECAUSE
Those who drink the real nectar from his lotus-like feet have no interest in wasting their life on unreal jabbering.
The quality of their training program is a good place to begin. While difficult to quantify, the importance of relationships that form between producers and the staff at the companies they represent cannot be overlooked. The training producers receive both when they are first contracted and on an ongoing basis can go a long way toward determining whether they become firmly entrenched in the company’s culture or if they try their luck with a competitor.
Tampax Pearl, Pearl Compak, Radiant 16 ct+ $1/1
13. Endstille
Much of the current research is based on anecdotal evidence from users of urine therapy. Nonetheless, its popularity is growing worldwide. The first World Conference on Urine Therapy was held in 1996 in India. Two more conferences were convened at three-year intervals: in 1999 in Germany and in 2003 in Brazil.
Ultimate Nail Laquer
and glistening, I quietly call to you
I do believe that human beings make the best angels, and so you know who you are.
I have finally found a novel that I have been searching for to read and really delve into! It is Darkfever by Karen Marie Moning. It is an urban fantasy series, and is the first novel that I’ve read where fairies (or fae, Seelie, and Unseelie according to the book) are dark, grotesque, and frightening creatures. It is a marvelous and mysterious read that is a fairly fast read but also contributes to a burgeoning vocabulary.
Now... it just so happens to be a NEW RELEASE DAY here at Teddy Bo Towers and here they are - the fantastic new Teddy Bo & Teddy Bea images ready to order now!!
It is so important to listen to the right voices. Many times we must tune out almost every voice around us to be able to focus on what is true for our own lives. Please don’t give any heed at all to useless opinions of others. Ask for yourself. Face your own truths then act on them. Turn off the confusing lies and tune them out. Plug your ears when they are annoying, loud, negative voices that have no business giving you opinions about your own life. You know so much more than you think you know. Your inner compass will guide you. Those feelings in your gut are your deepest wisdom. Be brave and tune out all the voices, except the voices that are speaking your truth. You are courageous and amazing and oh so loved.
And don’t ever forget that the most important sexual organ is the brain.
I have snapped at my kids, just yelled at my dogs, swore at my neighbour.
The BBC programme was typical of what one would expect from the State broadcaster. The British Establishment is a central part of the international cabal which seeks the destruction of difference, in order to create a uniform world of mindless materialists. For such people, men and women are the same, and it is therefore merely an enhanced form of cosmetic surgery to change the physical appearance of one into the other.
what on the surface was a
WAIT #0: nam='log file sequential read' ela= 32788 log#=0 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016453547 WAIT #0: nam='log file sequential read' ela= 18309 log#=1 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016471921 WAIT #0: nam='log file single write' ela= 518 log#=0 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016472654 WAIT #0: nam='log file single write' ela= 516 log#=1 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016473225 Media recovery not enabled or manual archival only 0x10000 WAIT #0: nam='log file sequential read' ela= 90 log#=0 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016473376 WAIT #0: nam='log file sequential read' ela= 73 log#=1 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016473474 WAIT #0: nam='log file single write' ela= 477 log#=0 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016473981 WAIT #0: nam='log file single write' ela= 856 log#=1 block#=1 blocks=1 obj#=-1 tim=100016474885
Intern: Oooooo, big deal, noobs. I’m so awesome. You all suck. See? Nothing’s happening.
I loved the black and white of it all.. and I fell in love with the flowers.
10.Big Fat Butterfly
So, really, just a good, refreshing update all-around! I do have some fun and fancy new works to show off sometime in the very near future, though very near may be a week from now. Or two. It's finals, and all. Thanks for sticking around!
+ Follow each sponsor on Twitter (Up to 6)
1 unresponsive
Living on a small homestead keeps him busy and out of trouble ...mostly.
“No talking to me now…I am getting my extra 10 minutes in.” I tell the bed.
Germany’s sovereign wealth is now going down the tubes in order to bail out foreigners who are part of the loose confederation of states which Germany foolishly got enmeshed in. Germans hate bailing out their trade partners. The US isn’t being bailed out by Germany or Japan, on the other hand. Instead, both plot as much as possible to turn the tables and increase the US trade deficit as much as humanly possible, that is, weaken the euro and yen as much as possible.
It’s a simple ornament made of thin cheap metal and it looks quite out of place on our CHRISTmas tree. But each year I lovingly and safely nestle it amongst its expensive and sparkly peers, without a care as to how unglamorous it appears.
When it came time for college there was a small check for the first quarters tuition and books and that was it. I was totally on my own. Tuition was earned, and I busted my rear for scholarships based on academics, not color or gender. Only failing that were there student loans. The loans needed were taken willingly and paid back, even if it meant no new car, no electronics or dinners out, for years. Like any debt, we took them on by choice, we paid them back, as that is what adults do, even if it seemed to be a very slow process.
Should I be feeling guilty or let the judges frown?
Yeah, I know, that's a pipe dream of mine. I wish we all could vote ourselves pay raises like you.
it was a work of fiction, that nothing lurks in those lazy
At the end of the final, she still had to perform her piece completely, so our professor took her outside,spoke with her for a few minutes, and when they returned, our professor announced she would dance the final piece with my friend. It was an incredibly sweet gesture, and reaffirmed every reason why I loved this particular professor. I will never forget the things she has taught me.
My contribution to Thanksgiving dinner was meant to be an apple pie as well as a cranberry-apple relish. Both recipes are family traditions, but the apple pie is especially beloved. It is my mother's recipe and she has made at least two of them every Thanksgiving for as long as I can remember. I started helping her when I was in elementary school, so it's a recipe that I could nearly recite in my sleep.
*because it's still all about me*
Just...drool..ummm...Wow! The art is by Kekai Kotaki who is best known for his work with Gears of War, Guild Wars, Magic the Gathering, and a few books covers such as the recent Shadow Prowler. All around he is producing gorgeous work with a bright future ahead of him. The cover for The Unremembered is breath taking in its depth and detail. Click to embiggen. It is worth it. Now on to the book itself, which doesn't sound too shabby either.
That said, there are side effects (again thankfully not much for me so far), and some are a little counter intuitive such as low t causes moobs but so does treatment (?&@?), acne (definitely a little worse), fluid retention (possibly) and being sore at the implant site for about a week each time.
Retweeting is a way to copy what someone else said while still giving credit for it. If you see a tweet that’s funny or interesting, you may want to retweet it for your followers or for anyone who didn’t see it before. Suppose my imaginary friend @HoustonAuthor tweeted this:
Issue Three:
maundering day
Fall Guard Tryout Practices will be held on Monday May 14, Tuesday May 15 and Wednesday May 16 from 2:30-4:00 in the VHS Gym. Try-outs will be held on Thursday May 17. Pick up an info packet on the office counter if you still need one.
I didn't take her too seriously at first, but as I watch the ability of my brain (and my husband's) slowly diminish, I'm starting to wonder if maybe she was right. Here are just a few reasons behind my suspicions that Jason and I may be developing hospital psychosis:
the leather clad elite of the lower east side
When it comes to burying Christian clay.
Once they have dried a little, place the remaining white chocolate in a small Ziplock bag and cut a tiny bit of one corner off the bag. Start small at first, then if you need, make the hole a little larger. Drizzle the white chocolate over the green truffles. Do the same with the remaining mint chocolate, drizzling it over the white truffles.
Conte’s Rituals (Schema, 2008) unveiled this nearly heavenly sound kaleidoscope in shades that were a little too primary and sounds that were frankly just a bit too obvious and ultimately annoying. So expectations for Nicola Conte’s Impulse (!) debut were on the low side.
You may also make use of the internet to know the details of the best lawyers around when you are living in the Virginia region. There are numerous websites that help you and you can even have the contact numbers of a few attorneys from the region. This will let you to begin somewhere right up until you locate the right legal professional to start off with your case.
It's a bit of a joke with one of my friends.
The old woman started breathing again, opened her eyes and frowned. What on earth did you do that for?!? the old woman demanded. 'Petra looked down at the woman, who was wearing a smelly old nightgown and responded. You were dead! The old woman pulled up the dirty duvet and said, I know! Finally, I've been waiting 20 years for this and then you go waking me up to this nightmare.
This is all backstory, and has nothing to do with what you have in the first paragraph.
Sue's card
I'm excited to tell you that our fabby sponsor is Wild Rose Studio!
About a week or so back I watched a video presented concerning the "ignorance" of those of us in the South. It seems that the fruitloop over at Driftglass driftglass.blogspot.com wanted to inform us that we ignorant Southrons had too much say in the electoral process and were ruining the country. Some of the comments were pretty silly also as one can imagine. I would be offended if they weren't so ridiculous. True, the video did contain some pretty uneducated (sounding) folk, but I would rather deal with them any day than some Ivy League schmuck (or Windy City schmuck for that matter). Now those are the folk who may truly be ruining our nation. .
“Do you two know each other?”
So, on the one hand, the police are attacked for being racist, that is, for treating blacks differently, but they are nevertheless subject to the demand that blacks be treated differently, according to the Marxist idea of need. Thus to behave in a “colour blind” manner is not something that treats everyone the same, irrespective of race or colour, but as something that recognises difference and needs, so treating them differentially because of race and colour, behaving, in other words, in a way which is paradigmatically racist according to the Macpherson Report’s own definition of racism. If certain racial groups are to be treated differently, then there is no equality before the law.
My mother tells me that one day while still a toddler in the Bronx, I climbed up to an open window and sat on the window ledge of our six story apartment building, happily dangling my legs and enjoying the concrete view across the way. Whatever danger lurked was beyond me and my puerile mind.
The song "Arizona" recorded under the CBS label in 1970 was a big hit single and went gold on US Billboard 100s.
Those who know me know I don’t take the easy road in any adventure. And I am not taking one in this year’s Script Frenzy. What adventure am I throwing myself into? Glad you asked.
yasya sarve samārambhāḥ
I plan to go back there very soon. This time, with my wife and daughter...I only hope that this time I can meet up with John Wills again and shake his hand...Before it's too late.
A Pakistani former dancing girl left fighting for life by a ‘horrific’ acid attack has committed suicide a decade after being heavily facially disfigured.
$1.75 Trillion: Annual Cost Of Federal Regulations. (Small Business Administration, September 2010)
Come out to play when you are hurt?
Before the reporter could quiz Najib further, he beat a hasty retreat. His engagement with the media was over in less than 10 minutes.
5% ABV
So, dear readers, what kind of political reforms do you think will help peaceful co-existence amongst our leaders?
I want to thank all of you for all your wonderful comments on my last post! I appreciate it all so much. It means the world to me :)
So it kind of makes perfect sense that I'm now writing for the Restaurants blog on the travel site Uptake.com. I'll be posting there twice a week, and so far I've written about hot dogs wrapped in bacon, deviled eggs and strong coffee. So grab some antacids and come and check it out.
“What about me? What color is mine?” Cassie asked. She had hair too, but Mom rarely brushed it. After all, she wasn’t going anywhere but outside to play and she always came in a mess so why bother.
But for you all, I have 5 new delectable recipes that I am going to test out this week!
Sperling
1/3 cup flour (i used orgran all purpose)
Do you want to be part of that?
Much to his great dismay, he never flew a plane.
It was not a "winner" and published in the newspaper, but it is on the web site. Word is getting out about this little "contest" the newspaper has and there are some gorgeous, professional looking photos being submitted.
Peter preached that repentance and baptism is for the forgiveness of sin.
Hope you like them! I am glad they are all done!!
Prior to his death, Don Hilario may have been the oldest known Spanish-speaking Filipino, and was the oldest member of the RAE.
is this argument about contraception, woman’s rights, morality or religious control? Join us Wednesday night for this discussion on #LFCRadio!
Father: "I knew you'd ask, so I talked to the youth minister at church. He said he remembers you from high school and you'd remember him, since he used to work the counter at the chicken place by the mall. We had real long conversation and he suggested the YMCA. He lived there while he was working on his degree. He said they'll work with you on the cost and offer counseling. What's really strange is that when he told me his degree was in accounting, I suggested he send his resume to human resources. They must be interested. He has an interview tomorrow and from what I hear, it's almost a sure thing, since he's going to school at night to work on his masters degree. Give him two years and he'll be a CPA."
The Big Four banks, Industrial and Commercial Bank of China , Bank of China, Agricultural Bank of China and China Construction Bank, account for about 40 per cent of China’s total loans.
Her abundance was her service but she did so with a heart that was only abundance.
Tuesday. April 17th. 5pm.
If no one in the US, UK, France, the UN or NATO’s technicians of death are held accountable for the sacking and looting of Libya- the crime of the 21st century, then expect that they will simply move forward, and do it again, and again. So who’s next? Syria?
Mix together bananas, oil, eggs, vanilla and milk in mixer. Add flour, baking soda, baking powder, salt, sugar, cinnamon and nutmeg. Blend well. Pour into prepared greased loaf pan. Bake for 1 hour 15 minutes at 350 degrees.
Ghostly present and in fear
DEFRA's annual data showed that the average UK farmgate price (Defra, Dairyco.net) stood at 29.27ppl at the end of January 2012. The GB average price was 29.38ppl in November 2011, 0.29ppl (1.0%) higher than the previous month and up 3.44ppl (13.3%) compared with November 2010. The Northern Ireland (NI) average for November was up slightly, to 28.76ppl, an increase of 0.20ppl (0.7%) compared with October and 1.07ppl (3.9%) more than the previous year.
12 West 19th St (near 5th Ave)
I am really excited about this color- it's lively, fresh, a little feminine, a little beachy. I think it will bring a nice bright pop of color to our home. And of course the day I made my decision I immediately went to work pinning... naturally. Let's take a look at some of my coral pinspiration! And I went a little pin-happy, so just click on the word "pinspiration" above to see all of the images I have collected.
I blame television for the whole damned mess.
The "goodies" former Speaker Nancy Pelosi promised us have already been rolled out, and lots of people have felt the benefits of them, particularly those with pre-existing conditions (like myself). Many liberal pundits have argued in support of the law by talking about the pain that would be felt if it was struck down. But keeping the whole confusing, cumbersome, ever-more-expensive law because of a few perks is not a good idea.
Conservatives drink domestic beer. They eat red meat and still provide for their women. Conservatives are big-game hunters, rodeo cowboys, firemen, loggers, construction workers, medical doctors, police officers, corporate executives, athletes, Marines and generally anyone who works productively. Conservatives who own companies hire other conservatives who want to work for a living.
In a marriage, it can be challenging to love one another some days, to still show in word and deed that we love each other. I can’t imagine how difficult it might be for couples that one or both of them don’t love each other anymore, or never loved each other to start with, because in these definitions of love is selfishness. True love, is Jesus love, no selfishness, but pouring out myself for the sake of my wife, on the good days and on the bad days. The good days are the days I get to enjoy loving my wife, on the bad days, these are the days I get to show her in word and deed, through action, how much I actually love her.
Berreo had begun a search for the golden city of El Dorado, whose fame had been so firmly believed and attested by the Indians that few Europeans thought of it as fabulous. It was believed to be far up in the mainland hidden among what The Times, in 1959, called 'the virtually unexplored jungles of the Amazon Basin and the Orinoco ... and the still ill-defined frontiers of Columbia, Venezuela, Brazil and the Guineas.... The unknown reaches of the Orinoco are a glimpse of the beginning of human time.'
Part of me thinks is it easier to just tell people your mom died than to say you just don’t speak to her. A person can only be hurt so much before enough is enough.
he farts!
“Marc leaps into action to save his friend, joining forces with the rough-edged Constable Cobb. The two soon discover that the victim was secretly smuggling American rifles across the border and selling them to local radicals. Was this a crime of passion or a criminal transaction gone wrong?
We'll just hug each other with all of our might!
I’ve just not had the headspace of late to write – not to work on my manuscripts, not to write blog posts, not to tweet and barely enough energy to cope with that bookish face thing. There has just been Too Much Going On. Dramas with the build (over budget and over deadline), dramas with my mother (two car crashes in one month), dramas with selling the house etc. And I can’t write effectively when things are dire and I’m stressed to breaking point. Equally, in that state I’m not actually remotely inclined to write at all - unless it’s simply to splurge words onto a page just to get them out of my ever-cluttered head.
Starter: Sprout Mash (Green & Cream)
“We will design the cover using a photograph or image supplied by you. You may supply your own cover if you prefer – please ask for the file specification.”
I reached in each compartment, begging the universe to send me something else of his.
The problem with this is it’s not showing up Dunedin’s average debt per ratepayer at a massive $11,056 to 30 June 2011, compared to Kaipara at $4,395 – also derived from councils’ audited annual reports. See Russell Garbutt’s comment http://dunedinstadium.wordpress.com/2012/02/21/kaipara-this-time/#comment-22152
· Candidates who have applied in the last 3 months
Electricity ran up and down Sam's spine. Had he read her mind? She was just thinking she was crazy, and then he said it. Maybe it was coincidence. It had to be coincidence. She needed it to be coincidence.
Yes, the second caddy of the list. You'll quickly learn that taking care of a newborn is all about easy convenience and that you may not think getting up to grab your nipple cream off the bedroom dresser is a big deal, but it is. Oh, it is. Have a basket where you keep all your breastfeeding supplies - pump parts, storage bags or bottles, hands-free pumping bra, nipple cream, breast pads....anything you need to nurse or pump. First, you won't lose anything (unless you're me and can lose the TV remote when you JUST changed the channel and haven't moved position WTF?), and second, when you go from the bedroom to the living room to the bedroom (or wherever your preferred nursing/pumping areas are) you just grab the whole thing and nothing is forgotten. As always: the name of the game is EASY.
I'm not going to change my style or try to coerce my kids into praying out loud every night. But I am going to cherish the times they want to share that conversation with me.
Fresh or frozen lemongrass- 1/2 a stalk
Unlike the prior two outings, I actually shot better with the Glock 17 than the Glock 19. There were no misses with the Glock 17 this time but there was one unfathomable and un-findable miss with the 19 at 50 feet. Ah well, it'll keep me humble.
The spring garden is heading into summer. I planted kale seedlings, gave away what I had left over, and then the freaking snails ate everything I planted. I may actually have to purchase kale seedlings. The peas were a fiasco. The snails devoured them. Once again, my leeks were a total failure. They bolted, and never got thicker than a pencil. Likewise, the purple salad mustard bolted in the seed trays. Sigh.
Karaoke Bank is up for sale and will likely go for a song.
The reigning World Champion is 0-for-2 on McClintock, and this time there’s a little more at stake.
And I should know.
Given prevailing atmospheric conditions during the past three weeks, it is instructive to remember that we pushed the start of Gravity Head into February precisely because doing so would garner better (colder) weather more suitable for strong ales and lagers. The weather's been better for a festival of wheat ales, but we (and you) have persevered.
“If”
~ Wrap all six in sexy dresses and tasty heels.
Denis Chua
“You didn’t marry any of them, it’s still comparing. Just stop. I hate it.”
Instead, Eve was meant to work alongside Adam to be with him in fulfilling all God required of them. Because of their common Creator, creation and purpose, men and women are intended to come together in the partnership of marriage and be inseparable.
“ You know your borderline when…”
Longtime Dick-heads Lord RC and Henri Winz are collaborating on a new PKD bibliography titled "Precious Artifacts." Lord RC's Pink Beam is already an indispensable resource, and Henri, who has run the PKD Bookshelf for years has an amazing collection of PKD stuff. Learn more about the project and contribute to a Kickstarter for the book project here.
Last summer i found a bag of more than 80 of these at a church garage sale on the south side. I think i gave the guy seven bucks for all of them.
The word power is literally translated “authority.” You have been delivered from the power, or authority, of darkness and placed into God’s kingdom. Jesus said, “All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. Go ye therefore…” (Matthew 28:18-19). And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: Teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I have commanded you: and, lo, I am with you alway, even unto the end of the world. Amen.
"Nope," replied the construction worker, "You are...I'm going to set the garage on fire."
Seracini, one of the world's leading expert in the field of the art diagnostics, used non-invasive technique, such as high-frequency, surface-penatrating radar and thermographic cameras, which confirmed there is an air gap behind the Vasari's fresco. The researcher inserted tiny cameras through seven drilled holes in the visible wall and found a 2cm cavity. On the back wall beyond the cavity, traces of an organic pigment were found.
His ideas are solid and can be very beneficial to improve the quality of one's life. He discusses health, finances, knowledge and relationships with others and God, just to name a few. After each short and very readable chapter, he ends with questions for the reader to think about.
Fats & Oils
It struck me that Josh felt no embarrassment. Or if he did, he had no way of showing it. He just seemed relieved, maybe refreshed even, in a fine mood and ready for dinner. What must it be like to be that free/ devoid of social shame?
To an impressionable schoolgirl, the story horrified my mother's friend and was the source of nightmares for some years to come, also, as it was a “fact” she had been taught at school, by an authority figure, she admitted, with some embarrassment, that she had continued to believe well intyo her 20's that the Russians had actually minced Hungarians.
We will not forget to pray, to give, to care.
H, C and I go to Immigration. Our visas are about to run out and we're terrified they might not be renewed. They need to see our tickets, so we'll have to come back tomorrow. We then spend 4 hours at Cable and Wireless as the international phone lines are operating again at last.
- Organic Bamboo Mini Pod: These are made with 3 layers of organic bamboo fleese. They absorb the same as the mini pod, but are more trim.
An we like dem give you plenny respeck.
Daniel Lynch, Associate Professor, School of International Relations, USC US-China Institute, University of Southern California
Walker is HUGE and just growing
Combine all except eggs and steep over low flame for 20 minutes.
I don't know yet if I'm going to watch Camelot. I probably will. But everyone seems far too incredibly pretty. I would have appreciated at least one wart.
I so badly want to write and to pour out my heart and soul but it just isn't meant to be at this moment.
That’s why I’ve joined several other members of Congress in a lawsuit against President Obama for engaging in military action in Libya without seeking the approval of Congress.
This brings up a point that I want to make. When you fully understand the female psychology of attraction, you will know that many opportunities abound to talk to women and get to know them. Sometimes they are hoping that a guy will come along and start a fascinating conversation with them. Next time you feel as though there are not many women that you can meet, take a ride on the subway and just talk to a woman. See what happens, and see if you can end up getting her phone number or a date with her. You might be surprised at how quickly she opens up to you.
The Daily Show has proven that as long as you stay current and in the flow of today’s normal college student, you too will have your own page wanting you to run for President.
The final step was to through the whole quilt through the washing machine and tumble dryer. The cotton batting shrinks by about 3% and it is what gives the quilt the bumpy old puckered look of an old quilt. If this isn't the look you want then the batting can be pre-washed first.
Three-and-a-half cups of coffee. Two scrambled eggs. Four (that’s right…four) pieces of french toast. (Did you hear that? I ate FOUR pieces of BREAD in one sitting!). A small bottle of syrup. Gideon’s leftover yogurt and blackberries. A glass of water. And here’s the kicker…six large pieces of bacon.
Seattle Seahawks: D
Best Weight Loss Tips – Daily Visits to the Scale
turned over to the scholars.
The top 1 percent’s share of national income has also been rising in most other advanced industrial countries, but it is by far the largest and has grown the most in the United States (see Jacob Hacker and Paul Pierson’s “Winner-Take-All Politics”).
If anything, Steve Miller Band Fly Like An Eagle Remix and other pastiche remixes are meant to enhance the status of the original song by making it more accessible.
Unfortunately these bottles are for decoration only, they don't actually stock Sierra Nevada and Trappist Rochfort. But what they do have is a small selection of the better known Belgian beers, from which I picked a Chimay...
From the start, the Lakers controlled the tempo of the game, slowing down the usually upbeat Denver Nuggets. They lead from “bell to bell,” and cruised to a 103-88 win in their first playoff meeting. (SG) and team captain Kobe Bryant lead the scoring with 31 points, 23 of them coming in the second half.
Whilst looking out and watching passers-by along Camden High Street submerged in biblical showers FMS sits comfortably drinking coffee, surrounded by cushions, dreadlocks and dream-catchers chatting to Wayne Murray of Boy Cried Wolf about why the man who appears to have it all still wants more.
Lord Sugar also tweeted that he would not consider standing as mayor himself. ‘It’s been suggested I run for mayor,’ he wrote. ‘Not possible, too many commercial conflicts, no time, more to the point I would not know where to start.’
With the Baby Boom generation underway, finding a name in the 1950s that no one had proved difficult. The most popular names in 1959 were Michael and Mary. The top baby names in 2007 were Sophia and Aiden.
Tonight a recommendation goes to the board of trustees to give a green light to a fundraising project to enhance the renovation of the school’s outdoor sports facilities to include a practice field, a scoreboard, a fieldhouse, and new bleechers. All in all the TAB Spirit of Support project plans to raise $250,000 over the next two years. It is hoped that this fundraiser can be kicked off in the next two weeks.
Wash the strawberries/redcurrants. Roll them in a plate with sugar and reserve.
and we had a few bets on each race ... with limited success.
I was dreaming of human treats when the little one piped in, though she chose visuals for her addition to the conversation. She just drug an empty paper bag to my feet. “What is this Ms. Mouse? Are you trying to tell me I need a bag of treats?”
Needless to say that after 3 months of working in an office 5 days a week and then being the Saturday salesperson at the antique shop (and then, just like God, I rested on Sundays), I missed out on flea marketing and estate saleing and thrifting, which was awful, especially when I'd hear of great estate sales. With a good estate sale, there's no point in going if you can't break down the doors and lock elbows with the pros at 7 a.m. on Friday--and around here, most of the sales don't go past Saturday. So this past weekend I got up early on Saturday and drove straight to my local flea market, where unfortunately the pickings were slim, at least until I got to Mr. Roger's booth. He sells real gold and silver jewelry, which I'm not interested in, but he also had a few pieces of costume jewelry that he'd had awhile since his customers don't want that. That's how I picked up the incredible sterling/marcasite brooch pictured above, as well as a couple shell cameos (one Florenza) and a few other items. I was so pleased that many of the vendors I'd become friends with last year (1) remembered me, and (2) wanted to know when I'm coming back as a vendor. I'd really planned on starting this past weekend but as I was standing there talking to my friends and trying not to pass out from the heat and 100% humidity I was pretty much ok with just being a buyer for the time being. I mean, it's not even hurricane season yet and it's miserable!
Our buddy Raymond Roman has yet again sorted through about 100 gigs of iphone footage of ours and came back with a pretty cool behind the scenes glimpse of our life on the road. Unfortunately it is just the band members with Cell Phone cameras so much of the performances were not captured but you do get a chance to see the pre and post show Monkeys In Space. Stay tuned- this is a 4 part series!
Mt. Hood is 60 miles from Portland so we had plenty of time to talk and even though Star now resides in Atlanta, she and Bonnie are both native Portlanders and familiar with the city’s history as well as the towns between Portland and Mt. Hood. Plus, Bonnie was able to photograph everything that I couldn’t.
It’s kinda nice to have a little energy. I’m waiting for the Twtichy level of energy though…
The Role: You would hardly call the Oscar-winning 'Eve' a true Marilyn movie, although her brief scene as Miss Caswell is indeed a memorable one. For the Betty Compton/Adolph Green musical adaptation, her role was entirely deleted. People were too busy lavishing praise upon Lauren Bacall, stepping into the Bette Davis role, to notice.
I knew that having a puppy around
Saturday was the Poulsbo Invitational Race. This was the 4th race in the seven race West Sound Sailing Association(WSSA) series. This race starts just north of Battle Point and with a south wind it heads to a temporary buoy near University Point, then north to the #6 navigational mark near Pt Bolin and then follows the shoreline to a finish off of Poulsbo Yacht Club in Liberty Bay. This course was 9.6 miles. In case of a north wind, the race is run first to #6 mark, University Pt and then PYC for a distance of 11 miles.
I am hoping that every month from now on, with the income that I am earning, I am able to continue to save RM1,000 per month in the FD, which will slowly make up a bigger amount. I want to make sure my girl will have a good and stable future when she starts her Primary education.
But how many Cokes have you drunk in your life so far? Hundreds to thousands, right? And they were all pretty good, yeah?
All the farms in the Transvaal. On these farms. All these farmers that are being killed. They are not all Boers. Sorry they are not all Boers. Some of them are our worst enemies. They hate us they deny us our independence. They do not like us. They never liked us. They always voted yes for this no for that. They have always voted against us.
2 hoped
Wispy clouds scattered about the sky. A line of demarcation separated the descending sun. It was as if a veil was dropping on one side of the sky while the other was lifting in light as the sun pushed its way down through the clouds. Balls of cotton floated in a blue pond at dusk…a sight to behold.
Deadline came for the contest. Had to randomly generate the 2 Recipients from a list of 22 Applicants. Well, first I had to actually disqualify one of the entries because of a problem with meeting the entry requirements. That by itself made me very, very woozy.
But apparently something was unclear. I was unclear about the fear.
Nutty
After our coffee we set off for the headboard. Viv was a bit worried about how far we had to carry it, but we were only out twenty minutes in total and that included the time spent paying for it. We also had to wait for the man to carry it to the door; he was not going to allow us to carry it through his shop. We had plenty of rests at the road junctions, and had no trouble fitting it in the lift, so all in all a trouble free collection.
"I want one!" came her wail as she stood on her tip toes trying to reach the suckers.
You can introduce this to your family in several ways:
That's it from me for now! Gotta run! I've got things to do!
We could now, if desired, replace 'necessary connection' by 'essential connectedness' where 'essential' merely means 'in the essence' (i.e. the ontological given). This formulation is, however, still not entirely satisfactory (except perhaps as an obeisance to Hume). Any use of 'connect' implies discreteness. 'Essential continuity' would be better. It is, in short, denied that discreteness is an inevitable part of an accurate and useful description. Paradigmatically, to say that X is the cause of Y is to say that X is the or a temporally prior category of what is also perceived as one event. Psychologically, our imputation of connectedness lies then in our ability to see that two events are in fact one or, more exactly, that one event has been made into two. To perceive X as causing Y is to recognize the larger event F. There is, of course, nothing sacred about the (often unnamed) larger category called here F It might, for instance, be characteristically more useful to group Y and Z as G rather than X and Y as F.
Get creative today doing this…
Kota Marudu MP, federal minister Maximus Ongkili has been unable to untangle the thorny issue.
Actress, BD 9/12/1963
I haven't updated this blog for a while. The beginning of the year sure was rocky for me, and very busy, what with my beloved kitty Stimpy dying on me right before Christmas, then getting a new kitten in early January (I didn't want to wait, since loving a new kitten helped distract me from it all) and dealing with the many health issues this new kitten brought along. He had to take many medicines for over a month, but is now a very healthy (and naughty!) little devil. His name is Sweeney and here is a photo of him:
And another thing.....I finally was able to upgrade my cellphone.....I am going the others in my family with an I Phone!! Really different than a Blackberry. Sure wish there was a way to add pictures to your blog from an I Phone. Anyone know of a way?
Since the birth of agriculture, when our ancestors began to cultivate and harvest grains, human beings have cherished bread. It was a minor miracle, this almost magical transformation of grain into dough. Bread became the staff of life, a daily source of nourishment, symbolic of spiritual renewal.
Q: Tell us about your other works, books, stories, etc.
First they cried out, “Kill him.” The exact words are seen in verse 22.
- Here Jesus indicates that our prayer of dedication MUST first acknowledge our humanness and complete dependence on the Father for both our spiritual and material sustenance. Without this sustenance, we cannot our of our own humanness, expect to be effective in being obedient to Him and His Word, That is why Jesus, in John’s Gospel says: “Without me you can do nothing” (Jn.:15:5). And that is also why in another place in John, He says; “I am the Bread of Life” and, “…those who eat my flesh and drink my blood abide in me, and I in them.” (Jn 5:35; Jn 6:56). We, in the Catholic tradition of faith, are able to fulfill this spiritual source of sustenance through the reception of the Eucharist, with the proviso, … “if we receive in faith, so that by partaking of His Body and Blood, He is strengthening and renewing His Presence in us” so that His Kingdom may be realized in us in the events and circumstances into which, by the Father’s grace and providence we have been placed.
So the relatives assembled at the temple; and when the priest had obtained their consent to the opening of the sepulchre, he led the way to the cemetery. Then, under his direction, the tombstone of O-Kame was shifted, the grave opened, and the coffin raised. And when the coffin-lid had been removed, all present were startled; for O-Kame sat before them with a smile upon her face, seeming as comely as before the time of her sickness; and there was not any sign of death upon her. But when the priest told his assistants to lift the dead woman out of the coffin, the astonishment changed to fear; for the corpse was blood-warm to the touch, and still flexible as in life, notwithstanding the squatting posture in which it had remained so long. [1]
Even in a political sense the state is confused. The American Civil War screwed us in that way with half joining the Union and half following the Confederation. This divide can physically be represented by Interstate 70, which cuts through the center of the state. I have grown up far south of the road and am accustomed to seeing the “Confederate Navy Jack” randomly flying among the back roads of my commute. And St. Louis City is well known to be silently segregated. North of 70, these issues taper off.
Cooking, baking, recipes. . . Dinner parties. . . Hosting a "Tea". . . Picnics. . . Church potluck. . . Birthday and Holiday ideas. . . Preparing for house guests. . . Entertaining at Home. . . The Family supper menu and plan.
Secretary of Education and Labor: Mark Levin.
You can really create a LOT of different necklines quickly and with very little fuss. To me, the facings are the key. Yes, binding the raw edges work, but you won't get a sharp, clean finish if you want more interesting shapes to your neckline.
Vagina in the Wild - Adventures in Pantslessness - They are self-cleaning and self-lubricating. They are a wonderfully well designed body part that speaks of feminine power and beauty. They leave wet spots on the couch.
Same old me; cycles of insomnia are nothing new.
Luke 22:31-32 And the Lord said, “Simon, Simon! Indeed, Satan has asked for you, that he may sift you as wheat. But I have prayed for you; that your faith should not fail; and when you have returned to Me, strengthen your brethren.” NKJV
2. Limit purchases on crafty items. I have to admit, I am a shopaholic ( not sure on the spelling)! I always buy more than I need, more than necessary. My hubby always say I could open my own craft store with what I have!
The Northeast Organic Farming Association of New York (NOFA-NY) is the oldest and largest organization in New York devoted to organic and sustainable farming and gardening, and counts over 600 farms among its 1700 members of farmers, gardeners, and eaters.
I want to say, 'Come on, there's another way'. But I take my cue from Terry. And I look at that expression he has when he's in that room - he's spent a sliver of time with Andrew and with the older couple - and he arrives at a destination that I claw towards: yes, there is another way, but this is their way. And I just feel sad that we're here and at this point where these are the questions we have given in to asking. Yes - dammit - we don't need to ask every question. We don't.
Au revoir,
My goodness gracious, isn’t this a persistent myth? But like so many myths, it has the unfortunate quality of being a load of bull-crap. Let’s look at the actual facts, shall we?
First of all, yes, we are undeniably not in what we consider a formal intifada, but resistance in Palestine is not limited to a traditional understanding of intifada. It is a constant state of being and a struggle which goes through phases of organization depending on numerous factors; it is a dynamic evolution based in a long history of a community regrouping and redefining the form and language of its resistance.
There are three venues I ended up frequenting more than others, and I'm going to say a few things about each, but the final of these mentions is also effectively an appeal, because whilst I was over there this fabulous and much loved joint was forced to close down for reasons beyond its own control and it may never be able to open its doors ever again.
So on to nipple cream. I'm talking about Lansinoh nipple cream available in the baby isle at Target, Walmart, CVS, etc. And it works wonders on your cuticles, as evident in the photo above.
Deep Purple Child in time UK
The book is available on Amazon at:
I have gotten so used to managing check lists for the wedding that I am doing them in my sleep. Unfortunately I can never find that notepad when I wake up in the morning. LOL!
The first is a wonderful project that YOU can be a part of: A Cookbook Fundraiser for Bethlehem Food Co-op. The Co-op folks are working on putting together a professional, color-photo cookbook as a fundraiser. They are collecting recipes now! Send one in and get it published! We will even borrow the talents of professional food photographers to make your dish look like a fancy supermodel.
A quick search with your favorite search engine will give you lots of ideas for using this story for a wide variety of lessons--easily adaptable for a wide range of age groups. Be sure to take a moment on the author's bio blurb on the book flap and visit the author's website at http://www.lynnecherry.com/
“£89!!” I squealed, “Are you MAD!”
When prison life got Omar Khadr down, he said he would think about how it felt to kill Christopher Speer, the U.S. army medic he murdered in Afghanistan.
"Time to come alive with some hit music and jive!" You have to give Kid Jensen this credit, without resorting to props or idiocy he comes up with something new to open every show. There is, however and sad to say, little jive about the show. Just in time for their final week in the top 30 the show has updated its Rubettes picture, the old five piece in the caps and suits gone in favour of what looks more like the cast of a dropped after one series northern based down at heel ITV detective series, except for the one wearing a pilot's uniform with cap.
P.S. If you or a subset of your clients don’t drink — no problem! Think about employing the same set up, but for dessert tastings. One advisor I consult alternates months between dessert tastings, wine tastings and has even thought about cooking classes with a top-chef!
We believe that our makeup is thick enough to look photogenic in pictures but also the thin enough to look flattering in "live" view. We don't wan't people to go "WHOA" at the cakey 2-inch foundation that's too thick but we also don't want people to think you got no makeup on your wedding day.
That was until I was offered a further glimpse into the realm of perfume by means of an internship - and to prepare myself a bit for the job, I started researching. I first turned to my local library and borrowed a couple books, and then I bought a few more. Then I started reading more perfume blogs and forums. I felt a whole new world unravel before me: science, craft, art - it was simply engrossing. The ingredients, the notes, the accords, the finished perfumes: I wanted to experience it all. The more I read, the hungrier for smell I became... and of course I started to look for my first true perfume, the first true love.
Your worship folder isn’t just for recycling anymore. Find out how taking the prayers, scriptures, songs, and readings from worship into other areas on Sunday mornings and throughout the week will help your discipleship walk as well as help you to encourage others. This practice also reinforces what took place in worship and helps to keep all of us on the same page.
However, on a typical trip, if I forget something major it’s just an awesome excuse to go shopping! But I am traveling to my first marathon here. I need my “Tried-and-True, Nothing New” stuff with me!! I need MY STUFF not new stuff. There are also a lot of variables in play here that make packing tricky. What if it rains? Should I wear a baseball cap or a headband? How hot will it be? Tank Top or Technical Tee? What if my feet are in bad shape after the race? What if I just can’t face the thought of wearing pants? (Don’t laugh! I often feel this way after extended bouts of exercise) Will I look ridiculous if I bring my cow girl hat?? (Answer… Don’t care, it’s coming with me). Anyways, I thought I’d share my packing plan and some tips for traveling to an out of town race.
and what takes place… a core group of people are running things in spirit…a nice quiet retreat energy… weekends are
Knowing You means all is not lost....there is always hope.
I am seriously crazy about My Mind's Eye new On the Bright Side collection. There are chevrons, distressed wood prints and denim prints that are all to die for! This collection is my favorite new release of 2012. I already have a few projects in the work with this paper! All of the paper components for this card came from the On the Bright Side One collection.
Nov 29 – Shahrizat brushes aside calls for her to quit over her family’s involvement in the NFC scandal, saying that it had nothing to do with her.
This beer pours a dark black with some light brown accents when held up to the light. A very thin brown head appeared only for a few seconds before it dissipated into nothing. The nose on this beer hits pretty well upfront with roasted grain, vanilla, coffee, and bitter chocolate. The flavor profile starts with the lactose sweetness on first sip and quickly balanced out by the chocolate/coffee-like malt. As the beer warmed I got just a touch of dark fruit in the background. The mouthfeel is full bodied and very creamy with plenty of sweetness after the swallow as well. The drinkability at only 7% is really nice, and would be a good entry point for people that may not like stouts.
13. American Land
And then we built the space shuttles. Possibly the most complicated machines the world has ever known, the shuttles had no equal. We sent them into space 135 times, trusting their ability to keep up to 7 people alive. We’ve brought them safely back to earth.
Masochism: Sitting through all ten hours of general conference.
So, how deep does this go?
Yes, this does seem a bit dramatic, but all of it has a bit of truth embedded deep inside the proclamation. My children are disgusting...I have several examples from this past week to prove it and I was also a bad Mommy this week...my children ate at McDonald's for lunch two days in a row! I can hear the chorus of sighs and gasps from you all the way over here at my house! Don't worry...My kids are not overweight, I didn't bride them with Happy Meals, and 50% of their lunch consisted of yogurt parfaits. So what if they washed the yogurt down with french fries and ketchup! So, why are my kids disgusting?? Well, here are a few examples!
Upon entering the workshop to see how the mechanic was going. He was working on unlocking the passenger side door and after some serious cussing and smashing his tools on the ground, the wife of the party decided to see if the keys were in the ignition or on the seat and instinctively pulled the lever up. To her surprise the door was unlocked.
Recently, former diplomats and experts both in Japan and abroad stressed the extremely risky condition of the Fukushima Daiichi Unit 4 spent nuclear fuel pool and this is being widely reported by world media. Robert Alvarez, Senior Scholar at the Institute for Policy Studies (IPS), who is one of the best-known experts on spent nuclear fuel, stated that in Unit 4 there is spent nuclear fuel which contains Cesium-137 (Cs-137) that is equivalent to 10 times the amount that was released at the time of the Chernobyl nuclear accident. Thus, if an earthquake or other event were to cause this pool to drain, this could result in a catastrophic radiological fire involving nearly 10 times the amount of Cs-137 released by the Chernobyl accident.
The next morning we ventured out to start clearing digging out. It was fun to get out but it was incredibly cold and beautiful! It was so sunny and hard to believe the day before had been such a storm. Everything was fine, Aaron dug us out, and we survived the big Midwestern snow storm. It was one for the books and very unforgettable.
memphis pics 2009
“Arhgjhrghfagrrghklrarghh!” I rose and went to begin my morning ablutions. As I showered, my mind couldn’t help but dwell on how easy it would be for a death-ball of slime to sneak up on me. The sound of its churning approach would be muffled by the running water, and no one would be in time to save my beautiful face from being eaten off. It would be a messy, painful death, I reflected with distaste as I shampooed, but at least my blood would wash down the drain easily enough. Save my mother a bit of labor.
Chrous:
The following post is the result of a Muslim, who knows me personally, who has recently deemed it okay to violate the sanctity of our religious-bond, by slandering me, by accusing me of being a Homosexual, something that’s considered a Major-Sin, according to classic Islamic-Texts. Let me first clear the air to all those who may read this: I am not a Homosexual, I’ve never have been. Now, if this is not good enough for some people out there, well, then, that’s your problem. I am a Muslim, and I am a Human being. Those who know me know who I am & how I live. So, for me to even have to jump out of the window, in order to clarify something that someone has viciously said about me, to purposely tarnish my Islamic social-standing, is really cruel. Anyway, I’ll get back to that in a while. Now, I intend to explore more of the Islamic spin on the subject of Slander.
“Right across from the stable,” Freydolf groaned, hurrying into his boots.
Trust this lady to be the first to champion a lampshade skirt dress from the Mary Katrantzou's Spring Summer 2011 collection and just get a load of that stash of jewellery! She also mentions having an entire flat in Milan to store her wardrobe (this video appears to be in her Parisian flat). Now that must be one serious dressing up box.
Spending 9 days or so in Utah. Today is International Beer Day or some such and I happen to have picked up a bottle of British beer: Oxfordshire Ales' Triple B.
The fight was on cable in those days and we neither had nor could afford cable but I did know that the neighbor who had just moved out of the apartment a few doors down had it as I could see the looping connection curled on the empty apartment floor as I passed the open window each day.
It’s hard to think of a Toronto-based composer of greater quality and integrity than Southam; that so little of her music has reached the general audience is our loss. From the outset Egoyan’s showed commendable commitment to a work lacking in superficial flash or obvious drama: performing Simple Lines, even for a specialist audience familiar with recent musical trends, takes both audacity and extraordinary sensitivity.
Sprinkle the mustard powder and fenugreek seed powder on top of the cut mango and chilli powder. Don’t worry if you couldn’t distribute the powder evenly, it all gets mixed in the end so no worries.
The truth about God is buried in our sub-conscious, sending out many beeps and chirps into our conscience. If we will listen for the truth and determine to follow it, it will lead us to God – if we ignore the chirps, it will eventually lead to our destruction.
Stuck in a rubber room?
If we look at 1 Corinthians 4 as a whole, we will find that it's talking about how the Christian should live and specifically, how the Christian should live when faced with hardship and trials. The first part of our focus verse, "for all things are for your sakes" is pretty easily understand and something we've talked about before. The Lord uses trials in our lives for our benefit. But if we look further into the verse, we will find that not only do our trials benefit us, but they can benefit the church as a whole. As others see us go through trials, and see the Lord's grace at work in our lives, it will bring encouragement and thanksgiving to them. Thanksgiving? Yes, in the sense that they are thankful for how the Lord is working and helping us thru the trial.
The wife and I have never been much to cuddle for some reason. This probably goes way back to some of her sexual issues and my sexual perversions. We started dating when we were young and back then, sex was not something you just did. You dated, you kissed, you circled the bases and after a while, maybe, sex. We played those games and did have sex before we got married. One of the big things though was the hand job. Guess it was more like you weren’t really having sex.
Seriously, I hope the Times keeps up with this nonsense. They are becoming more transparent by the day. Thanks to the psychos at the New York Times, people are going to have an easier time painting a mental picture and associating "men and women of good will toiling endlessly to make her (Amerika) better" with Al Sharpton and Malik Muhammed.
And here's some info about our second sponsor, Paper MakeUp Stamps:
Quick facts about Dearborn’s Intermodal Passenger Rail Station
When she goes to sleep
I am not complaining here but rather observing. As I began my temporary project Monday the universe made its presence known right away.
So hey ho, love and war and all that, moving on...
½ cup (113g) sugar
Companies try to explain their limitations by stating that users don't actually own the ebook they bought. They simply own a license to use it it.
“What prayer is that, Mister Rogers? What kind of prayer has only three words?”
Gerry & The Pacemakers You’ll never walk alone UK
“When other creditors of the SABC find out about this, there will be a rush from everyone to get their money.
“Back. Back. Back. Back. Back. Back. Back. Back. Baaack. Baaack. Baaaaaack! Back! BACK! BACK! FUCK! WHAT YOU DO?”
There's nothing quite like a crackling fire for creating a warm and cosy atmosphere...
Baba Kamma 37b. Gentiles are outside the protection of the law and God has "exposed their money to Israel."
Destinations and Songs
COLSON WHITEHEAD is the author of the new novel Zone One, as well as the novels Sag Harbor, The Intuitionist, John Henry Days, and Apex Hides the Hurt. He has also written a book of essays about his hometown, The Colossus of New York, and his reviews, essays, and fiction have appeared in the New York Times, The New Yorker, New York Magazine, Harper's, Granta, and other publications. A recipient of a MacArthur Fellowship and a Whiting Writers Award, he has been nominated for a Pulitzer Prize and a National Book Critics Circle Award. He lives in New York City.
I even managed to get hold of a large Moroccan tent that had been shipped over from the Sahara. We put it up in the garden as the perfect accommodation for those adventurous spirits looking for a ‘glamping’ (glamorous camping) experience! As Karissa and others will vouch, it was worth it just for the comedy of watching Sonny, Aaron and myself figure out the finer details of giant tent building. Much easier with camels, I’m certain.
Junior Murvin - Cross Over
Sugar sodas: 6
“Jump. Just jump. We will catch you.”
This post is from Thursday night 1/21/11. Blogger has been hating me and hasn't let me post anything for 2 days. :(
The text was from my teenage daughter. My daughter who was sitting five feet away from me. To say the way we communicate has changed since I was a kid is a huge understatement. Yes, the amount of technology at our (and more importantly, at our children’s) fingertips can be overwhelming and scary. Stories of teens committing suicide, or being beaten over mean texts they’ve received flash across the news. It’s enough to make parents think twice about letting their sons and daughters have cell phones at all.
As a resolution for May, I have decided to be more “in the moment” by simply letting go of other stresses, worries and anxieties. There is no one in this world who has no problems, and it is impossible to become an individual who has no stresses… therefore there is no point in even beginning to reduce your stresses, because once you do, another one will creep up.
The financially strapped U.S. Postal Service is considering cutting as many as 120,000 jobs.
1 tolerate
The next morning, I asked him if he'd been able to fall back to sleep.
"Candida! sit sit sit come come come come, sit." What??
My reaction? Let me surprise you. Mr Transparency is yawning. This simply replicates what would happen if the FBI tracked the fellow with a classic "tail." He was publicly visible the whole time. If a tail was okay, then why not save us money? Yes, yes, this may lead to "them" knowing where we are all the time? So? That's coming. Protest it? Protest the sunset. Both are inevitable.
Wait until you have a full load before switching on the dishwater or washing machine. Did you know ‘half-load’ programmes use more than half the water and energy of a full load?
Date: Thursday 3rd May 2012
we hyped up the show all week, so come saturday i was little nervous we would be disappointed because our expectations were so high. well, let me tell you, it was one of the best shows i've ever seen. epic. oh yea, and i joined in on a mosh pit for the first time ever. i was a little frightened at first, but really it was extremely exhilaration.
This it is then that he enforces here. “In this we know that we are of the truth, when in deed and in truth” we love, “not only in words and in tongue: and assure our heart before Him” (1 John 3:19). What meaneth, “before Him?” Where He seeth. Whence the Lord Himself in the Gospel saith: “Take heed that ye do not your righteousness before men, to be seen of them: otherwise ye have no reward with your Father which is in heaven” (Matt 6:1-3). And what meaneth, “Let not thy left hand know what thy right hand doeth:” except that the right hand means a pure conscience, the left hand the lust of the world? Many through lust of the world do many wonderful things: the left hand worketh, not the right. The right hand ought to work, and without knowledge of the left hand, so that lust of the world may not even mix itself therewith when by love we work aught that is good. And where do we get to know this? Thou art before God: question thine heart, see what thou hast done, and what therein was thine aim; thy salvation, or the windy praise of men. Look within, for man cannot judge whom he cannot see. If “we assure our heart,” let it be “before Him.” Because “if our heart think ill of us,” i.e. accuse us within, that we do not the thing with that mind it ought to be done withal, “greater is God than our heart, and knoweth all things.” Thou hidest thine heart from man: hide it from God if thou canst! How shalt thou hide it from Him, to whom it is said by a sinner, fearing and confessing, “Whither shall I go from Thy Spirit? and from Thy face whither shall I flee?” (Ps 139:7-8) He sought a way to flee, to escape the judgment of God, and found none. For where is God not? “If I shall ascend,” saith he, “into heaven, Thou art there: if I shalldescend into hell, Thou art there.” Whither wilt thou go? whither wilt thou flee? Wilt thou hear counsel? If thou wouldest flee from Him, flee to Him. Flee to Him by confessing, not from Him by hiding: hide thou canst not, but confess thou canst. Say unto Him, “Thou art my place to flee unto” (Ps 32:7); and let love be nourished in thee, which alone leadeth unto life. Let thy conscience bear thee witness that thy love is of God. If it be of God, do not wish to display it before men; because neither men’s praises lift thee unto heaven, nor their censures put thee down from thence. Let Him see, who crowneth thee: be He thy witness, by whom as judge thou art crowned. “Greater is God than our heart, and knoweth all things.”
And tomorrow he has to move out of his house. And into the care of virtual strangers to live out his days with more indignities than anyone should ever, ever have to suffer.
First flight is scheduled for second half 2013 with type certification and entry into service expected in second half 2014.
Datuk Mat Zain Ibrahim, a retired Kuala Lumpur CID chief, said Shahrizat (picture) need not resign as Cabinet minister, but called on the authorities to take action against her family based on evidence obtained so far.
I sat next to Chef, listening to a great band and reminiscing on the night. Chef matched his tie to go with my dress. That was really cute, something no guy I’ve dated has ever considered. (Interesting note: he actually loves wearing suites and tuxes. You can’t beat that! There’s nothing worse than having to convince a guy to dress up for an event.) Chef had actually weighed in on my shoe choice, and didn’t roll his eyes at me while doing so. He had told me repeatedly throughout the night that he felt lucky to be with the prettiest girl at the entire wedding (points for that, and he’s a good liar). He had gotten me drinks, humored me when I was incredibly excited about wedding cake and overall been a really good date.
Enjoy your Penang Nyonya Style Vegetarian Pickle with steamed rice!
In the end – I had so much fun styling my room to look like Jill’s. It didn’t come out looking like hers at all but I actually learned a lot by doing this. Taking a few key elements from another room that you truly love might be all you need to spruce up your own room. And the few changes you make, might make you love your own room, all over again!
An elderly driver had no time to react. Police said he would not be charged. The boy was taken to hospital with head injuries. His only contact with the car was the windshield striking his head, according to police.
The dilemma here for me is I wonder if I would have made a big deal about not getting the extra 20% off. All my friends are like well they had to give it to you...but a part of me was just going to purchase the sale items regardless.
Sometimes I get one or two books, other weeks I'll get nearly a dozen books. Some weeks, I’ll receive a finished (i.e. the version people see on bookshelves) copy of a book for which I received an ARC (Advance Reader Copy) weeks or months prior to the actual publication of the book. Sometimes I'll want to read everything that arrives, other weeks, the books immediately go into the "I'll never read this book" pile, while still others go into the nebulous "maybe-I'll-read-it-category." More often than not, it is a mix of books that appeal to me at different levels (i.e. from "this book holds ZERO appeal for me" to "I cannot WAIT to read this book yesterday"). Have a guess in the comments about which book fits my reading labels “I’ll Never Read…” “Zero Appeal” or “cannot wait” "maybe I'll get to it later" and so forth...
strengthen national and facility-
Keep up the good work everyone!!!
Well, this train carries saints and sinners
Praise His Name, O my soul
( I wonder what is there in it that can make me love it or see some joy in it. I wonder what I can do to influence the situation. I wonder if there is an opportunity hidden here? )
Now, I guess your waiting patiently to see who the last winner for 2011 was...
Overall, a great wine for the money- serious structure, restrained fruit, shows finesse in the winemaker’s skills. Serve well chilled with seafood, chicken, light pork and veal dishes especially with cream sauces. Great with a Grilled Salmon Caesar Salad, paella, seafood curry, pasta carbonara or linguine with white clam sauce. 89 points- might be a 90+ with the right food!
Yes you're all quite right, it was the humdrum of everydayness, the rainy (very) muddy days and November-into-December greyness that just got to me, but I'm pleased to report the crisp frosty landscape this morning with pink-edged sky was exhilarating, and as soon as the ice cleared I took dear Bruce for a wonderful wintery ride blessed by sunshine and birdsong, and told him all the things that were on my mind.
- Vouchers for free oral examinations and polishing
Pepper Pot, All hot.
One of the main dish we had, Pork loin with stuffing. Really good!
"Well, yes, every time we go for the all-you-can-drink at Biyagura, it's local beer made by Ise Kadoya and other brewers."
So today I’ve watched the new reveal trailer for the next installment of the Call of Duty franchise: Black Ops 2. The game is to be a direct sequel to Black Ops but set in the future as you can see in the trailer.
My left eyelid just doesn't like to rise up to the occassion. It was pointed out in front of me a hundred times as a child, maybe that is where the insecurity about it stemmed from. I also had a great lisp, which a year of speech therapy corrected, apart from when the wines or vodkas or rums have been flowing. Funnily enough the eyelid gets lazier when those thirst quenchers have been flowing too. I imagine I'm quite the hottie after a session - one eyelid nearly shut and lisssssssssping my arssssssssssseeeeeeee off.
My husband and I were invited to attend an event celebrating alumni excellence at SAIT Polytechnic.
Khostov shrugged. “I killed them.”
Well I can't think of a better place to spend a Gotcha Day than the beach!
This is from someone who needs to get it out.....
2 t vanilla
THE FUCKING END
The story itself was absolutely gripping and a real page turner. Clear your day because once you've picked this book up you won't be able to stop until you've reached the end! Kimberly Derting has pulled out all the stops to create a plot which is thrilling, heart pounding and exciting. The final page by itself is jaw-droppingly good and I'm thrilled that there's set to be another book in the series.
She would not tell Jarrad that day. She left the restroom and took his hand, staying close to his side. Their relationship was too new to be tested with such unusual complications. He took her home. She would stay off her computer the rest of the night. It had been a busy day.
Under a Red Sky: Memoir of a Childhood in Communist Romania by Haya Leah Molnar
I didn't make the cut-off/I'm not on the List of Campaigners :(
The main reason I enter giveaways and sweeps is because that's the only way that I can "provide" all these awesome goodies and extras for my family. We just can't afford to go out and buy Flip cameras, or video games whenever we want to. We definitely can't afford to go on vacations, so that is exactly why I enter. I hope to win a family vacation some day, so my kids can also experience it. I know it's possible, and just keep hope that one day we will get blessed with something amazing for the whole family to enjoy.
You don’t have to fall into one of these categories all the time. You can be different with different people. I think I’m working to go from the wilderness to the garden. I want to be able to maintain my relationships with people by discussing things that bother me and also discussing things I enjoy. Instead, I often just let things go their natural course without making much effort. I would like to be able to nurture relationships and let people know when I think things are wrong before they get out of control. I’m not sure where I am though neither did Dr. M, but she did agree when I came up with the analysis that I am probably the wilderness working toward the garden.
Not anymore.
twining around mastoid
The caravan hastes,
Masturbation is a natural sleep sedative, but can also increase energy levels, by giving you a little “pick me up” (no need for the bit of white powder on the hand mirror anymore).
Jennifer and I hope that you will join us for this lively challenge and the chance to be chosen by Andrew Zimmern as the winner of a lovely Aunt Else's Æbleskiver pan. And to our global blogger friends: international entries are totally eligible!
Adduction means to add an extremity towards the midline of the body. (Example: move one arm or leg back towards the midline of trunk of the body.)
The whole process of bottling is run by gravity instead of pumps. this yields a much softer tannin in the wine. The owner of the winery challenged the engineers to create the structure so that he could get the most integrity into each bottle. Why care for the grapes, harvest, crush, ferment, then ruin the product in the process with pumps?
- In London, England, there is still a law that states London Taxi cabs must carry a bale of hay at all times.
This kit will include the album that you'll get to decorate yourself and 6x6 chipboard page inserts, plus all of the patterned papers, cardstock, ribbon, brads and twine that you'll need to complete the project. You'll also get our detailed yet easy to follow directions with Cricut Cut Chart, well-organized written instructions, and plenty of color photographs.
ungasan@banyantree.com
Proper dog training may want to begin the moment you bring the raccoon home. In case allow your pup to actually wee all over the floor carpet for your initial couple of numerous his life style, and
statements are made by the mind chart of a stating, always
Join local professional photographer Jim Crotty on a photo excursion at Burke's Beach on Hilton Head Island. Jim will be guiding a small group and providing field instruction on the basics of nature and landscape photography with the DSLR camera. Emphasis will be placed on capturing the beach and sky at sunset and in twilight. There will also be instruction on close-up photography of natural subjects on the dunes and on the beach. A DSLR camera, zoom lens and tripod is highly recommended. Group size limited to eight people. Images captured during the photo walk at Burke's Beach will be utilized in session two for instruction on digital workflow and editing.
But let me tell you about cheese. The Crankycrumbs are considering an experimental vegan diet, for a week. Probably after the holidays. Laugh, monsters, but a lot of the food we eat is vegan already.
I actually really like what the Rams did in this draft. They scored Michael Brockers in the first round, but made really nice picks at receiver with Brian Quick and Chris Givens. They aren’t ready yet, but could scare some people for the Wild Card in 2012.
( I automatically asked for a box and placed half of the meal to go -
Jump to the other side of rue Rambuteau, where another patisserie creates sidewalk bottlenecks. Pain de Sucre, which was opened in 2004 by two pastry chefs, is the haute patisserie of the street. Great big, square tarts of rhubarb and raspberry are accented with rosemary; tablettes of chocolate are studded with wild strawberries or whole hazelnuts; and the perfect rows of macarons include flavors like elderflower, lime, chocolate mint and cherry-pistachio.
Reciprocity - The partnership policy purchased in the williston north dakota rentals an IMCA sanctioned track situated on the Upper Missouri Valley Fair Grounds. The season starts in May and finished in late September and each weekend in between is filled with racing excitement. The Speedway's schedule includes Mini Sprints, IMCA Modifieds, Hobby Stock, IMCA Stock. They host special events during the williston north dakota rentals as low-cost housing, alternative energy development, and infrastructure construction not only come to visit because you are dating in North Dakota. Home to the williston north dakota rentals is 26 feet tall, 46 feet long and weighs 60 tons. The buffalo was built in 1959. The surrounding area is surrounded by neighborhoods populated with friendly people. The pace of life is definitely of the nation has actually lost nearly as many state parks and forests. These are great opportunities to get out and stroll through the williston north dakota rentals of deer, fox, ring-necked pheasants, sharp-tailed grouse, and Hungarian partridges.
The ground beneath the trees is muddy, but bears just enough growth to not become a puddle and is littered with big stones; just the perfect size and shape for dry-stone-walling and exactly right for surrounding campfires. At one side of the place is a rocky incline which is topped with a flat tap-root, making a good seat.
Patrick Stewart is a fine actor and at his finest here. What’s so impressive about his performance is that he’s silent for most of the time and is tucked away at stage corners yet he’s presence is undeniable. Stewart is a master and it shows; he understands the text and he’s the driving force to this show.
People with BPD often feel they don’t know ‘who’ they really are, where they fit in the world and their sense of who they are can vary depending on the situation they are in, change often and rapidly. Not knowing who you are or where your life is going can lead to making many major life changes. For me this biggest area this has affected has been career aspirations…
- I've baked these rolls with all Guinness Stout , with Guinness stout supplemented slightly with an ounce or two of chocolate stout, and I've baked them with the alternate beverage listed, apple cider (I used the non-alcoholic kind, although the recipe might have been contemplating the "hard" kind).
318Celestial palms, and ever-blooming flow'rs.
notes right now, "So and so told me about this and we wanted to support you". I've been on the end of sending $10 to random adopting families for a few years now. And I always thought, Oh, well, I wish I could do more but I just want to be a part of bringing this child home... I don't know if that's how y'all feel; but I hope you know: You are a part of this! Jesus said what you have done for the least of these children, you have done for me!
The first time I heard "Jenny" it blew me away. It was almost eerie. Very bare bones, just guitar with some blues licks overdubbed (by Peter Green). The eerie part is the echo on it all and Mayall's odd murmurings. I think it's one of his finest vocal tracks, totally soulful.
“Inside Job” is a film that is so utterly horrifying, so enraging, so depressing that you can’t leave the theater unmoved.
Pedal number two (right) was also built by my lucky-find-on-ebay Hertfordshire master craftsman. This time it’s a clone of a Z-Vex Super Hard-On boost pedal, but in a fantastic sparkly blue case with a big red chicken head knob. Following it’s mod in the Mesh, it now helps me to channel up to 4 times more strength in each of my musical attacks. I introduced this pedal to the board shortly before defeating the Meatmunk for the first time… during that battle, when I kicked the blue-stomp-beauty in, I have never before witnessed such fear in the crossed eyes of my enemy.
TV shows, sales people, weight loss commercials, they all imitate love to get your attention. Sex sells. Still…. sex isn’t love. Don’t be fooled. It’s everywhere. And I don’t want you to settle for someone with a sales plan and a mask.
Well, his pants are wearing thin - his condition, it's a sin
Since it is Friday (yay!) it's also time for a new challenge over at Totally Papercrafts. This week's challenge is brought to us by DT member Mel, and the theme is Song and Dance. I had to wrack my brains a bit to find a stamp that fit this theme, and decided to use this little Kewpie:
We do not think the majority of EDL supporters are even aware of how they are being used. All they see are St.George's Cross flags and an organisation which SEEMS to be opposing the unwanted Islamification of Britain...and that is all they see!.
Tonight, he actually fell asleep within 15 minutes of being laid down. That hasn’t happened in over a week. I must’ve done something right! Like I said, the worst feeling is not knowing what to do.
Well the weekend is here already, time just flies by. My grandson is making his Communion tomorrow. Can't believe he is almost 8 yrs. already.
And then I know I don’t want to be.
I won't be moving to Savannah, Atlanta, or Lacoste.... At least not now; I will be attending through their E-Learning program for my B.A. in Interactive Design... I am really looking forward to it, and hope that I will even attend some of the events through SCAD.
There are two pronounced flavors in this beer, candy and spice. The initial impression is of sugar--it's perhaps the sweetest beer I've ever tasted. Candy sweet, though, not thick and malty like a barley wine. It is fairly effervescent, and I also get a cola note, which makes the whole affair taste, at first blush, like a Pepsi. But then the hopping comes in, and pretty robustly. It's peppery-spicy, and it doesn't balance the cola so much as draw your attention away from it. The finish remains sweet, but the hops do stay with you.
My plan now involves a couple of hours of pathetic moaning. Why am I telling you all this?
Since I have nothing better to do to move my building project forward right now, I've decided to use method 3 and do it now, and this way, it will save time during the actual building process, because I won't have to stop and diddle every bag. I decided that if I can't start building, I can at least do something that moves things in that direction.
Slinky - Overloaded (#205. White cover. Black vinyl)
I’ve included some photos of our garden as it is this year so far. As you can see, in just a few short weeks the plants are already making their appearance. I did goof up a little this year, however. I forgot to write down what everything was and where it was planted, so we will have a bit of a surprise when they mature!
Bless You are my radiator IS
Start a blog and follow people with similar world views.
I've been wavering back and forth on Hunter boots for so long...do I really need them? Well, obviously no, I don't. But I've decided that I would like them! High gloss black please...
There is still a strong link between the fields and the foaming pot.
My friend concluded that it was because of our pal’s upbringing and culture, where in his country, people are more laid back, grateful and unguarded.
but I ain't a baby no more
BACKGROUND:
That being said, I think that growth should not be paired with the expectation of “arriving,” but rather seen as journey requiring many restarts. Perhaps growth is more like being a perennial. I spout, grow and bloom to my peak for that season, but then in time, taper off, fade and retreat to the ground for a time of hibernating only to re-bloom in the next season. The beauty of this perspective is not in the permanency of the change but in the strength required to consistently regrow, based on the previous temporary bloom. Each new arrival bringing deeper roots, thicker foliage, a healthier bloom and possible off-shoots. These days I find myself desiring to abandon expectations of permanent change and embrace both the growing season and the necessary periods of dormancy with grace and patience. Besides the idea of being a perennial is so much more appealing than consistently striving to be an evergreen.
Let's think about this: Maybe the government wouldn't have to spend so much money on getting kids to be physically active outside of school, if they didn't spend so much time (and now even more money) trying to get them to stop moving during school.
I also received another item that isn't related to Kershaw or Koufax and isn't even a card.
We celebrated our 46th wedding anniversary while we were away - 46 years spent with the love of my life. I have been so blessed.
For this fun and easy mani I used two coats of white, then sponged on three different shades of peach, I started with the darkest and went to the lightest. The first one I used is Funky Fingers taffy town, second I used Finger Paints circus peanuts, and last I used Julep Hayden. It turned out to have nice depth, with still having good bright color :) The first picture is flash, second is natural light.
Note: As a participant in and representative of OSRCon, I want to urge all my readers to look into the event details via the OSRCon website and blog, and PLEASE consider making the trip up to Toronto to play some frikkin' GAMES! In addition to my Labyrinth Lord game, it looks like James M. will be there running Dwimmermount (!!) and there are sessions featuring Pendragon and Expedition to the Barrier Peaks as well.
Have you had fun at Chuck E. Cheese? I hope you'll leave a comment and tell me about it - feel free to leave a link too if you've posted about it!
WINGS
Flutes flutes
Arlington is home to area well-known shopping centers including the Parks at Arlington, where the kids love to ice skate and the parent’s love to shop; Lincoln Square, containing some of the most well-known stores and boutiques in Arlington; or the Shoppes at Brownstone Village, a one-of-a-kind marketplace with delicious boardwalk pastries, food and specialty boutiques.
We are pure love and pure truth that get distorted and tainted along the way, by the one’s who try to decide they know better than what is natural to our soul’s.
However, the graphics are where the fun ends - and the erroneous content begins, especially because of all the overstretched and unsupported climatological - and other - hypotheses....
We were all lead to believe that the British National Party was a political party and that we intended to win at the ballot box and bring change democratically. For many years that was happening at a local level however since Jim Dowson joined the scene it has changed from that to doing whatever we can to get money for HQ. Even when the local groups and branches raised money our accounts were plundered and raided by HQ to cover their own incompetence.
1 exciting
Yet the BBC is more than happy to give this sort of nonsense wider coverage, stirring up further animosity on both sides whilst pretending to be neutral. It still only has the picture of his bruised and scratched wrists to confirm 'abuse' - but that is what happens when you struggle in speedcuffs, standard issue to all police in the UK. They are designed to hurt the more you move and keep you still.
So! In the spirit of the New Year, I hereby profess to write less about non-headache inducing things like politics and more about the fulfilling pursuits I enjoy so much such as gaming, literature, music, health, academia and science, and documentaries. Even just typing those out feels so much better.
I've converted so many people to these bags and even did a fundraiser for my daughters school selling them.
The thread seems to more than anything else, detract from the real story. Unless he was trying to make a political statement of some sort, I don't see the point.
1.) I don't eat grains. (This is not 100%...I eat croutons on salads from time to time - maybe once per week, or so, and sometimes, the call of a cupcake or half a donut is just too much for me to bear! And beer hasn't completely been eschewed as of yet. So I'd say I'm about 90% grain free at this point.)
The sun rose; I popped a bit of flash off on the front of the truck, underexposed the ambient: Very moody and impressive shot.
-Jeff Hodge, DataCert
The seventh challenge requires a picture to be painted. Most outsourced operations are technical or technology assisted, hence, the responsibility for the seamless functioning of the operation falls squarely on the (user) organisation’s own IT team, either directly or indirectly, for managing the efficient and effective delivery of the service. The CIO therefore typically assigns an IT team or engages the services of a specialist independent entity, to oversee the multi-sourcing initiative, managing the relationships for the overall outsourced operation.
Yeah, and it honestly wasn’t like “we’re only gonna tour with these bands.”
Daddy: “I dunno, the clouds, the air, the sky, god”
Ephesians 6:4
Vervet monkeys are known to elicit predator-specific alarm calls. Three well-documented vervet monkey alarm calls are those for leopard, martial eagle and python. Leopard alarm calls are short tonal calls produced in a series of inhalations and exhalations. Eagle alarm calls are low pitched grunt while python alarm calls are high pitched "chutters". Different alarm calls seem to evoke different responses to individuals that heard the alarm calls. However, the first reaction of a vervet monkey upon hearing an alarm call is to look at the direction of the caller. Looking at the direction of the caller gives them clues as to why the alarm calls were made and also where the caller is facing reveals the direction of the approaching predator. You can listen to these different alarm calls on this site.
50ml icing
You’re gonna love it, just love it…
Moyra Donaldson was born and brought up in Co Down and has been described as one of the country’s most distinctive and accomplished writers: a poet whose voice is full of integrity and mystery. Her first full collection of poems Snakeskin Stilettos was published in 1998, followed by Beneath the Ice in 2001, both from Lagan Press. She has received four awards from the Arts Council NI, most recently, the Artist Career Enhancement Award. Moyra’s poems have featured on radio and television, including the Channel 4 production, Poems to Fall in Love With. Horse’s Nest, was published by Lagan Press in 2006 and described in Poetry Ireland Review as ‘one of the most enjoyable poetry books of the last few years.’ Her most recent collection, Miracle Fruit, was published by Lagan Press in November 2010.
And I never say ‘no’ to S. (left in photo) when she wants to grab a bite in a place I haven’t been to yet.
as long as you're
Karen had combined her Rudolph Day Christmas card with the snippets playground and what a stunner too - all gold, cream and burgundy - it's truly beautiful. Do hop over here to see what I mean. And, another super way of using ribbon too, plus a lot of work must have gone into all the embossing as well as everything else Karen did when making this card! Love it!
The New York City Police Department in corporation with the Brooklyn Clergy Coalition to Reduce Violent Crime will be hosting a "Cash For Guns" buyback program.
“Finn?”
Acts 17:24
John 21:15-16
